B. SPECIFIC QUESTIONS 

1. In view of the provision for Member States to support the Union’s external and security policy actively and unreservedly (Article 11.2 TEU), it is desirable to know what your country’s treaty obligations are under international law, and whether they will need to be modified in view of accession. For this purpose, it would be useful to have a list of your existing treaty obligations, and those under negotiation. In this context, it would also be useful to obtain information with respect to your country’s positions towards the International Criminal Tribunal for the former Yugoslavia and the International Criminal Court. 
After gaining its independence, the Republic of Macedonia, in conformity with its declared policy of developing and improving the bilateral and multilateral relations based on the principles of the UN Charter and other fundamental international, universal and regional documents, has concluded and continues to conclude numerous international treaties and other instruments of bilateral and multilateral character. In parallel, in accordance with Article 4 of the Constitutional Law on Implementation of the Constitution, the Republic of Macedonia decided to continue the implementation of the pertinent inherited obligations deriving from the international agreements concluded by SFR of Yugoslavia. Also, the Republic of Macedonia specified and notified which bilateral agreements concluded by the former Yugoslavia remained in force for the country, and for which the validity had ceased as far as the country was concerned. This situation is shown in Annex 1 for each country individually.  In regulating its relations with other countries by agreements, the Republic of Macedonia departs from the principle that it would consider as being in force all the pertinent agreements that used to be in force in the former Yugoslavia in case the obligations contained therein refer also to the Republic of Macedonia. In accordance with Article 24, Paragraph 1b of the Vienna Convention on Succession of States in respect of Treaties (to which the Republic of Macedonia is also a Contracting Party by means of succession from the former Yugoslavia) the Republic of Macedonia accepts that a bilateral agreement remains in force if one could conclude by reason of the conduct of the other state that the two states had so agreed. The Republic of Macedonia will continue to regulate this issue by separate agreements with the states with which this has not been done yet.  When a new agreement between the Republic of Macedonia and another country is concluded, a clause on the validity of the previously existing agreement(s) is regularly introduced. Namely, the clause prescribes that the validity of the previously existing agreement(s) in that same area between the former Yugoslavia and a respective country ceases as far as the Republic of Macedonia is concerned.  The current obligations of the Republic of Macedonia deriving from agreements in force are represented in three annexes as follows:    List of bilateral agreements concluded between the Republic of Macedonia and other states, (see 27_Annex_01),   List of the multilateral treaties to which the Republic of Macedonia is a Contracting Party (or, in some cases, only a Signatory), (see 27_Annex_02  List of bilateral agreements, which are subject to negotiations between the Republic of Macedonia and other states, (see 27_Annex_03). a)  Position of the Republic of Macedonia towards the International Criminal Tribunal for the former Yugoslavia The Government of the Republic of Macedonia, on a number of occasions, has confirmed its firm political commitment to close cooperation with the International Criminal Tribunal for the former Yugoslavia, in particular concerning the cases of war crimes committed during the 2001 conflict. The Tribunal has reiterated the positive assessment of this cooperation on several occasions, including during the last visit of the Public Prosecutor of the Tribunal to the Republic of Macedonia on 18-19.02. 2003.  The cooperation between the relevant institutions of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the International Criminal Tribunal for the former Yugoslavia, to which every state is obliged according to the United Nations Security Council Resolution 808 (1993) establishing the Tribunal, includes extending different forms of legal assistance, conducting investigative actions on the events related to the two cases over which the Tribunal took jurisdiction – the ‘Ljuboten’ and ‘Neprosteno’ cases (submission of information, assistance in identifying and securing presence of witnesses and suspects for the purpose of their interviewing by the Tribunal, etc.) The Tribunal cooperates with a number of governmental institutions, while the main coordinator of this cooperation is the Ministry of Justice. Within the framework of the cooperation in the field of CFSP, the Republic of Macedonia, on 21.10.2004, aligned to the Common Position 2004/694/CSFP on Further Measures in Support of the Effective Implementation of the Mandate of the International Criminal Tribunal for the former Yugoslavia  For more details on the modalities of cooperation of the Republic of Macedonia with the International Criminal Tribunal for the former Yugoslavia see I_M_01 and I_M_02b)  Position of the Republic of Macedonia concerning the International Criminal Court On 06.03.2002, the Republic of Macedonia ratified the Rome Statute establishing the International Criminal Court as the 54 country - prior to its entering into force with the 60 ratification on 01.06.2002, manifesting in this way its firm support to the establishment of the Court. For more details on the steps that Republic of Macedonia undertakes to adjust its legislation in order to implement the provisions of the Rome Statute see I_G_05.  The Republic of Macedonia continues to support the International Criminal Court and is in favour of strengthening its role and universality.  The Republic of Macedonia regularly aligns itself with the EU statements on this issue within the United Nations. Lately, this has been the case, inter alia, with the Statement of the Dutch Presidency at the 59 General Assembly of the United Nations, within the framework of the VI Committee, under a.i. 146 (on 14.10.2004). The competent authorities of the Republic of Macedonia undertake all the steps required to initiate the necessary procedure for acceding to the Agreement on the Privileges and Immunities of the International Criminal Court, with a view to complete the procedure in the first half of 2005.  On 30.06.2003 the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the United States of America have signed an Agreement regarding the Surrender of Persons to the International Criminal Court (Official Gazette of the RM No. 70/2003).  
2. In view of the provision for Member States to co-ordinate action in international organisations (Art. 19 and 20 TEU) it is desirable to have a list of the relevant international organisations of which your country is a member (with date of joining) or is negotiating membership, such as the United Nations, the Organisation for Security and Co-operation in Europe, the Council of Europe etc. Has your country any executive functions in international or regional organisations (e.g. chair) or does it plan to become a candidate for such positions? 
The Republic of Macedonia is a Member State of numerous international organisations of universal, regional and specialised character. Detailed information of such memberships is presented in the following annexes to Chapter 27:    List of International Organisations of Universal Character  of which the Republic of Macedonia is  a Member State, see 27_Annex_04;    List of International Organisations of Regional Character of which the Republic of Macedonia is a Member State, see 27_Annex_05;    List of International Organisations of Specialised Character of which the Republic of Macedonia is a Member State, see 27_Annex_06;  
1. United NationsDate of accession to the Organisation of the United Nations: 08.04.1993 Basic accession document:  United Nations Security Council Resolution 47/225, upon Recommendation of the Security Council (SC), comprised in Security Council Resolution 817 of 07.04.1993.  Participation of the Republic of Macedonia in the work of the United Nations bodies and its Specialised Agencies (by way of election):  1.  Membership in the subsidiary bodies – functional committees of the ECOSOC:  In the past:    Member State of the Commission on Narcotic Drugs, from 2000 to 2003:    Member State of the Commission on Population and Development, from 1996 to 1998:    Member State of the Commission on Sustainable Development, from 1999 to 2002;  Current membership:   Member State of the Commission on Sustainable Development, from 2003 to 2005 2. Member State of the subsidiary bodies of the General Assembly:  In the past:    Governing Council of the United Nations Programme for Human Settlements (UN-HABITAT), from 2001 to 2004 Current Membership:    United Nations Commission on International Trade Law (UNCITRAL), from 2000 to 2007:  3.  Selected individuals nominated by the Republic of Macedonia in organs and bodies of the United Nations (ad personam membership):  In the past:    Mr. Goce Petrevski, Chairman of the Second Committee of the 50 Session of the United Nations General Assembly, 1995 -1996:    Mr. Ivan Toševski, member and Chairman of the Working Group on Enforced and Involuntary Disappearances of the Commission on Human Rights, from 1980 to 2003; member of the Board of Trustees of the United Nations Voluntary Fund for Victims of Torture from 1981 until the present; over the last three years Chairman of the Board;   Mr. Naste alovski and Mr. Srgan Kerim (subsequently) members of the Bureau of the Preparatory Committee for the International Conference on Financing for Development, 2000-2002:  4.  Membership nominations:  In the past:    A Nominee for a non-permanent Member State of the United Nations Security Council for the period 1998/1999, at the 52 Regular Session of the United Nations General Assembly in 1997 (not elected);    A nominee for membership in the United Nations Economic and Social Council (ECOSOC) for the period 1999/2001, at the 59 Regular Session of the United Nations General Assembly in 2004 (not elected);  Nominations for future membership:   Nomination for President of the 62 United Nations General Assembly in 2007;  5.  Participation of the Republic of Macedonia in the work of the UNESCO bodies (membership gained by way of elections) In the past:    Intergovernmental Council of the International Programme for the Development of Communications (IPDC) 1995-1999;    International Hydrological Programme (IHP), 1995-1999.  Current membership:   Intergovernmental Council of the International Programme for the Development of Communications (IPDC) during the 32 session of the UNESCO General Conference in October 2003, for the period 2003-2007.  
2. Organisation for Security and Cooperation in Europe (OSCE)  Date of accession: 12.10.1995, upon Permanent Committee Decision No. 81.  


3. Council of Europe Date of accession: 09.11.1995.  Participation of the Republic of Macedonia in the bodies of the Council of Europe (by way of election):  In the past:   In 2002, the Republic of Macedonia chaired the European Audiovisual Observatory, an extended Partial Agreement of the Council of Europe.    In 2001 and part of 2002, the Macedonian Member of Parliament, Mr. Azis Polozhani was elected Vice-President of the Committee on the Honouring of Obligations and Commitments by Member States of the Council of Europe (Monitoring Committee) of the Parliamentary Assembly of the Council of Europe.  Current membership:   President of the Association of Units of Local Self- Government and present mayor of Vinica, Mr. Goran Angelov is the current President of the Rotational Secretariat of the Network of Associations of Local Authorities in South-Eastern Europe (NALAS).  Elected individuals in the organs and institutions of the Council of Europe:    Margarita Caca Nikolovska was elected judge of the European Court of Human Rights.  
4.  World Trade Organisation The Republic of Macedonia became a Member State of the World Trade Organisation on 04.04.2003.  
5.  European Union (EU) The President of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, Branko Crvenkovski, on 22.03.2004, in Dublin, submitted the Application for Membership of the Republic of Macedonia to the European Union to the Irish Prime Minister Bertie Ahern. The Application for Membership is the result of long year efforts (by an aide-mémoire, the Republic of Macedonia applied for the Europe Agreement as early as 1992) to accomplish the strategic commitment for membership in the European Union.  Considering the aspirations for enhanced relations with the European Union, based upon the broadest possible consensus of the citizens of the Republic of Macedonia, an evolutionary clause stressing the desire of the two parties for earlier strengthening of the contractual relations was included in the Cooperation Agreement (signed in 1997, and entered into force on 01.01.1998).  The Stabilisation and Association Agreement signed on 09.04. 2001, which following ratification entered into force on 01.04.2004, as the first of this kind ever, also included an evolutionary clause, by which the Republic of Macedonia gained the status of Potential Candidate for EU membership.  The Council of the European Union on 17.05.2004 adopted a decisions requesting from the European Commission to prepare an Opinion on the Application of the Republic of Macedonia for EU membership.  6. North Atlantic Treaty Organisation (NATO)– Partnership for Peace (PfP) The aspirations of the Republic of Macedonia to NATO membership were officially declared with the Decision of the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia of 23.12.1993.  On 15.11.1995, the Republic of Macedonia acceded to the Partnership for Peace Programme (PfP), becoming thus the 27 Partner of the Alliance. On 01.03.1996, Macedonia was admitted to the North Atlantic Cooperation Council, which was later transformed into the Euro-Atlantic Partnership Council. (EAPC). On 18.01.1997 Macedonia was admitted to the Planning and Review Process (PARP).  At the NATO Washington Summit of 1999, the Republic of Macedonia was accepted as official candidate for NATO membership, while on 28.10.2004, in Brussels, it presented its Annual National Programme for Preparations for Membership in NATO for the period 2004/2005.  Within the framework of its activities for earlier integration in NATO, the Republic of Macedonia was one of the founders and active participants in the so called Vilnius Group, the cooperative spirit of which continued even after the admission of seven of its Member States in NATO.  For the purpose of accelerating the process of integration in the Alliance, the Republic of Macedonia and the other two aspirant countries – Albania and Croatia, supported by the Untied States of America, enhanced their mutual cooperation through coordination of their activities within the framework of the Adriatic Charter for Partnership signed in Tirana in May of 2003.  On the basis of the hitherto results, the Republic of Macedonia anticipates invitations for membership in the Alliance not later than 2006.  Initiatives:    In 2003, within the framework of its active participation in the NATO Initiative for South-Eastern Europe, the Republic of Macedonia held the Chairmanship of the South-Eastern European Security Cooperation Steering Group (SEEGROUP).  
7.  Central European Free Trade Agreement (CEFTA) On 30.06.2003, the Republic of Macedonia submitted its application for membership in CEFTA.  The procedure is underway.  
8.  Stability Pact for South Eastern Europe  The Republic of Macedonia has participated in the Stability Pact for South Eastern Europe since the launching of this initiative on 10.06.1999 (for more details see answer 27_B_03).   Activities and functions accomplished in the past:    The Ambassador of the Republic of Macedonia in Germany, Mr. Sran Kerim was a  Representative of the Special Coordinator of the Stability Pact for South Eastern Europe, Mr. Bodo Hombach, in the period 2000/2001;   Mr. Igor undev, Assistant Minister for Multilateral Cooperation at the Ministry of Foreign Affairs, was Co-chairman of the Working Table I in the period January-June 2001;    Mr. Gligor Bišev, Vice-Governor of the Macedonian National Bank, was Co-chairman of the Working Table II in the period January-June 2000;    Mr. Jani Bogoevski, Head of Sector at the Ministry of Foreign Affairs, was Chairman of the Working Group on Liberalisation of Trade in the period 2000/2002;    Mr. Violeta Maova, State Secretary in the Ministry of Economy, was Chairwoman of the Working Group on Trade Liberalisation in the period 2002/2003;     Mr. Trpe Stojanovski, Assistant Minister of Interior for International Cooperation and European Integration, is Co-chairman of the Working Table III from July 2004 to June 2005.  Current Activities:    Host to the Regional Centre of the Migration, Asylum, Refugees Regional Initiative - MARRI (opened on 18.11.2004), which become operational from the beginning of January .In the framework of this Centre envisaged to be included are two other initiatives of the MARRI – The Access to Rights and the Regional Information Exchange;    Host of the annual meetings of the three Working Tables and the VIII Regional Table of the SEE Stability Pact, held on 17, 18 and 19 November 2004 in Skopje;    The Ministry of Health of the Republic of Macedonia, in 2004/2005 is the Chair of the Executive Board of the Health Network of SEE countries;    Regional Coordinator of the project: “Club of Women Members of Parliament in South Eastern Europe” in the period 2003/2004, the Macedonian women lobby together with the Macedonian National Bureau of the Working Group on Equality of Sexes.  Future Activities:  The Republic of Macedonia will host the Regional Centre for Social Policies, as of January 2005.  The SEE Stability Pact launched the initiative, while the European Commission and the Council of Europe will fund this three-year project.  
9. Central European Initiative (CEI) The Republic of Macedonia applied for membership to the Central European Initiative (CEI) in May 1993, and at the CEI Prime Ministerial Summit of 1993, in Budapest, it became a full-fledged Member State.For more details see the answer 27_B_03.  Nominations: The Republic of Macedonia is Co-chairman of the Working Group on Tourism (anticipated for 17.12. 2005, in Trieste).  
10.  The International Organisation of Francophone Countries – La Francophonie The Republic of Macedonia became an associate Member State of the International Organisation of Francophone Countries on 05.09.1999. The procedure for full membership is underway.  
3. In view of the objective of strengthening the security of the Union and its Member States in all ways (Art. 11.2 TEU), it is necessary to know the state of relations between your country and neighbouring non-member countries, including other countries which have applied for membership of the Union. For this purpose, the Commission requests you to provide summary information on your co-operation with neighbouring states, including both co-operation in regional organisations and bilateral co-operation. 
REPUBLIC OF ALBANIA  
Political relations: After the accession of the Republic of Macedonia to the UN, the Government of the Republic of Albania, adopting a Declaration on 26.04.1993, recognised the independent and sovereign Republic of Macedonia. The two countries established diplomatic relations in December, the same year. Following the signature of 16 bilateral agreements in 1997, in line with the commitments by both countries to promote the relations in all fields, their cooperation was particularly intensified. The shared commitments of the two countries to mutual respect for the sovereignty and territorial integrity, non-interference in internal affairs, respect for human rights and freedoms for all, including ethnic minorities, in accordance with the respective national legislation and following international standards and criteria, have helped create a new climate in their relations.  The Republic of Macedonia was constructive in the period of the crisis in the Republic of Albania, undertaking a series of concrete steps in order to assist in the prompt restoring of the disrupted security in this neighbouring country. The political contacts are at a high level. They are featured by intensive dialogue, as well as by numerous unofficial meetings and personal friendly relations between political representatives of the two countries. Such contacts have reaffirmed and encouraged the cooperation in attaining the strategic commitments to membership of the European and Euro-Atlantic structures, as well as the commitments to further developing the economic cooperation, to designing joint measures for prevention of all forms of illicit trafficking, to improve border security, and to advance the living conditions in the cross-border zones. The European Commission in its Stabilisation and Association Report also noted such features of the bilateral relations on the Republic of Macedonia for the year 2004. The intensive political dialogue reaffirms the new quality and dynamics in the development of good-neighbourly relations and comprehensive cooperation between the two countries, in all spheres of mutual interest. 
Bilateral Agreements. Large number of bilateral agreements, accords and protocols has been signed, making a solid basis for bilateral cooperation development. However, more efforts are required for their full and consistent implementation. (for more details see 27_Annex_01).  Economic Cooperation.  The economic cooperation between the two countries is not at the desired level. It consists mainly of trade and lacks higher forms of cooperation. In 2002, the two countries signed a Free Trade Agreement. The Republic of Macedonia is ranked among the ten largest trading partners of the Republic of Albania. The 2003 trade volume between the two countries was increased, primarily as a result of the increase of imports from Albania, which in the period thereto was significantly lower. In the first nine months of 2004, the same trend is maintained, as compared with the same period in 2003. The Republic of Albania has a 0.6% share in the total foreign trade of the Republic of Macedonia. Hence, in terms of trade volume the Republic of Albania is not Macedonia’s major trading partner. However, in light of the determination to advancing relations with neighbouring countries, the Republic of Macedonia dedicates significant attention to the development of economic cooperation. (for more details see Table at the end of the answer) The Republic of Macedonia attaches great importance to the cooperation under projects related to the construction of Corridor No. 8, and takes into consideration the need for a more active engagement of both countries, especially in providing financial sources. In this context, there is interest for realisation of the project for construction of the AMBO Trans-Balkan Oil Pipeline and for establishment of a permanent joint working body, composed of representatives of the Republic of Macedonia, the Republic of Albania and the Republic of Bulgaria, to align their joint activities.  In April 2000, in Tirana, with a view to intensifying economic cooperation, the Chambers of Commerce of the two countries signed an Agreement on Cooperation and a Business Forum was established. There is interest in and efforts are made for inter-connecting the electric power systems of the two countries. The transmissions lines that the Republic of Macedonia has shown interest in are: 22kV Vrutok-Bureli, 440 kV Skopje-Tirana, and 400 kV Bitola-Elbasan, or alternatively Bitola-Zemlak.  It can be assessed in general terms, that despite the progressive trend (the trade volume has increased by 4% after the entry into force of the FTA), the economic cooperation has still not reached the required level and the two countries have not utilised all opportunities in this respect. 
Border cooperation. The cooperation in this area is based on 7 signed agreements regulating the maintenance and demarcation of the border line, measures for prevention and resolution of border incidents, the visa regime and the transport of civilians in the border zone, legal assistance in civil and criminal law matters, mutual execution of court decisions and extradition. The Agreement for Regulation of Borderline Communication and Transport of Civilians in the Border Zone is officially applied as of 15.06.2000. This Agreement has alleviated the problems of illegal border crossing, thefts and similar. The two countries agreed to open a new border crossing point: Dzepište-Trebista. The Joint Committee on the Maintenance, Renovation and Demarcation of the Border Line had only one meeting - in 1998, in Skopje. The Republic of Macedonia expects the Albanian side to convene the second meeting of this body.  The Ohrid Border Process initiated by the EU, NATO, OSCE, and the Stability Pact for South Eastern Europe has significantly contributed towards strengthening the cross-border cooperation.  
Cooperation in other areas. In recent years, the Republic of Macedonia and the Republic of Albania have had successful cultural exchange, which ultimately has resulted in the start of the harmonisation of the text of a Cooperation Agreement in this field.  The defence cooperation is very intensive and yields results also in respect of the efforts aimed at attaining the shared strategic commitments to membership of the EU and NATO. The Ministries of Defence of the two countries established cooperation in 1992. Their cooperation is intensive and successful and the Ministers have had several meetings ever since. The border units of the two countries are jointly trained, under a project sponsored by the Danish Government. In July 2003, in the Republic of Albania, there was a joint exercise of troops of the armed forces of the Republic of Macedonia, the Republic of Albania and Italy.  Trilateral meetings of the Ministries of Defence of the Republic of Macedonia, the Republic of Greece, the Republic of Albania and the Republic of Croatia have also been held. The Ministries of Internal Affairs of the two countries successfully cooperate, especially in the fight against organised crime and illicit trafficking in arms, and drugs. In addition there is successful cooperation in the field of judiciary, finances, transport and communications.  The cooperation of the Ministries of Local self-Government of the two countries is diverse, especially in cross-border cooperation and exchange of experiences in the process of territorial decentralisation. A Memorandum of Cooperation between the said Ministries is expected to be signed in the near future.  Cooperation in education and science is based on the bilateral agreement in these fields, which has helped overcome the several year problem of recognition of diplomas. Based on the signed bilateral agreements, the cooperation in international passenger and goods road transport is successfully developed, complemented with the cross border traffic of persons in border zones, mutual assistance and cooperation between the customs administration bodies, environmental protection, etc.  The two countries have also concluded a Memorandum on Cooperation in the Process of European Integration (17.06.2004).  
Regional and Multilateral Cooperation. The Republic of Macedonia and the Republic of Albania cooperate within the UN, the OSCE and the Council of Europe. The Republic of Macedonia supports the efforts of the Republic of Albania for prompter inclusion in the European and Euro-Atlantic integration processes. There is continuous and successful cooperation under the Partnership Charter. Both countries are interested in further intensifying the cooperation under the South-East European Cooperation Process and under the CEI, as well as in continuing cross-border cooperation, especially in the context of Euro-regions.  
REPUBLIC OF BULGARIA 
Political relations. The present relations between the Republic of Macedonia and the Republic of Bulgaria are featured by continuous political dialogue, friendship and cooperation in many fields of mutual interest. The converging positions on key international issues result in a constructive political cooperation between the two countries, regionally and multilaterally. The Republic of Macedonia consistently pursues its commitment to building good-neighbourly relations and comprehensive cooperation with the Republic of Bulgaria, to finding solutions and overcoming possible disagreements on certain issues, by way of open dialogue.  The Republic of Macedonia has been intensively cooperating with the Republic of Bulgaria since Macedonia’s independence in 1992 and after it established diplomatic relations with this neighbouring country, in December 1993. This trend was significantly enhanced after the Prime Ministers of the two countries signed a Joint Declaration in 1998, followed by the conclusion of more than 22 bilateral agreements, regulating the relations in several key areas. Presently, 30 bilateral agreements have been signed between the two countries (for more details see 27_Annex_01).  
Economic Cooperation. The economic cooperation between the Republic of Macedonia and the Republic of Bulgaria has been of varying intensity in the last period. The Free Trade Agreement that the two countries concluded in October 1999 is applied as of 01.01.2000. The Agreement is harmonised with the WTO Provisions and Rules, and offers the opportunity for promoting regional connections and establishing higher forms of cooperation. The trade volume between the Republic of Macedonia and the Republic of Bulgaria in the last two years, and especially in the first nine months of 2004, is featured by a significant increase, specifically in terms of exports from the Republic of Macedonia, contributing towards a more balanced bilateral trade. It is expected that after the establishment of the free trade zone on 01.01. 2005, the trade between the two counties would be even more balanced, in light of the comparative advantages of both countries for joint presentation at third markets (for more details see Table at the end of the answer). The payment operations, inter-banking cooperation and other administrative and non-customs barriers will soon be regulated by bilateral agreements.  A Joint Macedonian-Bulgarian Chamber of Commerce has been established, while the Joint Inter-Governmental Macedonian-Bulgarian Committee on Trade and Economic Cooperation deals with the implementation of the Agreement on Promotion of the Cooperation in this field.  There is a growing interest in both countries for establishment of mixed companies in the area of trade and services. The volume of the investments between the two countries is low. In the 1991-2004 period, the Republic of Bulgaria has invested a total of 13.30 million EUR, with a more significant growth of investments in the last three years. Regular meetings, contacts and joint initiatives of the local authorities and communities aimed at advancing the economic relations and the overall development in the cross-border area feature Cross-border Cooperation. In the context of European integration of the two countries, the European Union has opened additional opportunities to advance the cross-border cooperation, under the New Neighbourhood Programme. The two countries have defined the Joint Program Document on priority cooperation areas for the 2004-2006 period, accompanied with a financial package for the Republic of Macedonia of 1 million EUR per year. Although modest in terms of financial volume, the added value that the Republic of Macedonia gains from this Programme is the country’s preparation to utilise EU’s structural funds.  
The Euro-regions established among the Republic of Macedonia, Bulgaria, Serbia and Montenegro and Greece: Skopje-Niš-Sofia; Morava-Pinja-Struma and the Belasica Euro-region have had a positive impact on the cross-border cooperation.  
The securing of the border has been transferred from the Ministry of Defence to the Border Police, in accordance with the Final Document of the Ohrid Border and Security Management Conference, in line with European standards.  Currently, there are three operative border crossing points between the two countries, while agreements have been signed for opening three new border crossing points.  Cooperation in Other Areas. The cooperation in the area of defence is of great importance in the relations between the two countries and covers several aspects. Ministries of Interior cooperate in the fight against organised crime and illicit trafficking in arms and drugs. The two countries also cooperate in the areas of justice and finance.  Cooperation in transport and communications is of great significance. An Agreement on International Passenger and Goods Road Transport has been signed and a Joint Macedonian-Bulgarian Committee on Road Transport has been formed. The Republic of Macedonia makes efforts to secure funds for construction of the Skopje –Sofia railway line.  Based on signed bilateral agreements, there is fruitful cooperation in the field of agriculture, forestry, water economy, then between the ministries of labour and social policy, of local self-government, health, education and science, culture, environmental protection, youth and sports, information etc.  
Regional and Multilateral Cooperation. The positive trend in the bilateral cooperation is reflected on the multilateral cooperation, within international organisations: UN, Council of Europe, OSCE and others.  In light of their shared strategic commitments, the two countries have signed a Memorandum of Cooperation in the European and Euro-Atlantic Integration Processes and a Cooperation Programme for 2005. The two countries also successfully cooperate under the Partnership for Peace/EAPC mechanisms.  The Republic of Macedonia and the Republic of Bulgaria are members of almost all regional initiatives. They continuously and successfully cooperate under the South-East European Cooperation Process, as well as under the Stability Pact, especially under its II Working Table. The two countries have submitted projects of joint interest, the implementation of which should create conditions for economic development of the countries in the Region (construction of the Skopje-Sofia railway line, construction of 400 kV transmission lines Štip-Blagoevgrad and Dubrovo-Štip, construction of the AMBO oil pipeline, the construction of the Ihtman-Kumanovo gas pipeline and the construction of new border crossings).   
SERBIA AND MONTENEGRO 
Political relations. On 08.04.1996, signing the Agreement Regulating the Relations and Promoting the Cooperation between the Republic of Macedonia and the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia, the two countries mutually recognised each other and established diplomatic relations. Signing this Agreement, the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia recognised the sovereignty, territorial integrity and the state legal continuity of the Republic of Macedonia as of 1944.  The normalisation of the relations was followed by intensive bilateral cooperation and contractual regulation of the relations in several areas. However, the cooperation and bilateral contacts between the two countries stagnated upon the escalation of the Kosovo crisis.  After the democratic changes in the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia, on 23.02.2001 in Skopje, in the course of the Summit of the South-East European Cooperation Process, the issue of the border was regulated by signing the Agreement on the Delimitation and Demarcation of the State Border between the Republic of Macedonia and the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia. The Agreement was ratified by the National Assemblies of the two countries and deposited at the UN. The border demarcation started on 24.11. 2002, by the placing of the border pyramid at the conjunction of the border between the Republic of Macedonia, the Republic of Bulgaria and Serbia and Montenegro.  The constructive approach of the new authorities of the State Union of Serbia and Montenegro and the acceptance of the principle of equality of successor countries to the former SFRY, have facilitated conditions for the resolution of the issue of distribution of assets of the former state. In April 2000, in Brussels, an agreement was reached on the distribution of assets deposited in the Basel International Settlement Bank, while on 29.06.2000, in Vienna, the five successor countries signed an Agreement on Succession Issues, regulating the distribution of movable and immovable property, the diplomatic property, finances, archives, pensions, acquired rights etc. All successor countries have ratified the Agreement.  The relations between the Republic of Macedonia and Serbia and Montenegro are at a high level and are featured by close cooperation and activities, and numerous bilateral contacts, at various levels. The joint assessment of the positive trend in the relations, the high level of mutual trust, understanding, good-neighbourliness that have practically contributed to preserving the peace and stability in the Region, overall, are reaffirmed at numerous and frequent meetings of the two countries’ leaderships and at other levels.  
Bilateral Agreements. The Republic of Macedonia and Serbia and Montenegro have thus far signed 23 bilateral agreements and documents (for more details see 27_ Annex_ 01).  There are initiatives for signing agreements in the field of informing, and on protection and use of cultural-historic monuments and memorials.  
Economic Cooperation. The bilateral trade is based on the signed Trade Agreement under which a larger number of goods are traded freely, by payment of 1% customs handling duty, while only a small number of goods are under the contingent regime. The Joint Macedonian-Serbian-Montenegrin Committee for Implementation of the Trade Agreement currently works on the harmonisation, amendments and supplements to the text of the Agreement. Serbia and Montenegro is the second ranked trading partner of the Republic of Macedonia, with a 12.9% share in the total foreign trade. The export share is significant, resulting into a surplus in the bilateral trade on the side of Macedonia. Such a volume of the trade or rather of the overall economic cooperation is satisfactory. However, there are still unutilised forms of cooperation between the companies of the two countries (for more details see Table at the end of the answer).  It can be assessed in general terms that the economic cooperation is satisfactory, but that there are possibilities for its enhancement.  
Border.  After the entry into force of the Agreement on the Delineation and Description of the State Border between the Republic of Macedonia and the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia, the demarcation started in 2002 and is expected to be successfully completed in 2005. The demarcation is financially supported under the CARDS Programme.  In March 2003, the Republic of Macedonia and Serbia and Montenegro signed a Protocol on Opening Border Crossings for Cross-Border Traffic between the two countries: Strezimir-Restelica, Tanuševci-Kodra Fura (Debalde), Golema orija-Goleš and Ogut-Trgovište.  
Refugees and Displaced Persons. There are about 1800 persons, citizens of Serbia and Montenegro still staying in the Republic of Macedonia, after the Kosovo crisis in 1999. In order to resolve their problems, several activities for their safe return to their places of living have been initiated. (for more details see answers I_K_01 and I_K_02
Cooperation in Other Areas. The Agreement on Cooperation in the Fields of Culture, Education and Sports defines the legal framework for the cooperation in the said areas between the two countries. The harmonisation of the text of the Agreement on Protection and Use of Cultural-Historical Monuments and Memorials started in July 2004.  The Republic of Macedonia and Serbia and Montenegro successfully cooperate in the field of defence. Cooperation is also successful between the Ministries of Internal Affairs of the two countries. A special importance is attached to further promoting the cooperation in the fight against organised crime and illicit trafficking in arms, drugs, etc, and to the issue of opening border crossings for cross-border traffic. The two countries have agreed on synchronised, daily exchange of information on activities in the fight against organised crime in the cross-border areas.  In the fields of transport and communications and international passenger and goods road transport, the two countries share the interest in intensifying the cooperation under Corridor 10 and for realisation of the related projects.  In accordance with the signed bilateral agreements, cooperation is also successful in the fields of justice, finances, energy (connecting the electric power systems and completion of the second 400 kV transmission line Skopje-Niš), mutual assistance and cooperation between the customs authorities, environmental protection (establishment of networks of cross-border protected zones and designation of bilaterally protected objects in the cross-border belts etc).  
Regional and Multilateral Cooperation. The positive climate in the bilateral relations of the two countries has a favourable impact on and results in intensive and constructive cooperation at the regional level, and under international institutions and organisations. The Republic of Macedonia supports the efforts of Serbia and Montenegro aimed at its prompter inclusion in the Euro-Atlantic integration processes, primarily in terms of the Stabilisation and Association Process and the Partnership for Peace Programme. The two countries share the interest in further intensifying the cooperation in the context of the Euro-regions: Skopje-Niš-Sofia and Morava-Pinja-Struma.  
The authorities of the Republic of Macedonia cooperate with the UNMIK, as well as with the interim Kosovo  authorities, in accordance with the United Nations Security Council Resolution 1244, in all areas of mutual interest and especially on facilitating issues of practical importance for citizens.  The UNMIK Liaison Office stated functioning in the Republic of Macedonia as of 14.06.1999. Aimed at facilitating the everyday communication, movement and transport of citizens of Kosovo to the Republic of Macedonia and their transit through the Macedonian territory to other destinations, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia adopted relevant Decisions accepting the validity of the (visa free) travel documents, registry plates and driving license issued by UNMIK to citizens of Kosovo. The Agreement between the National Insurance Bureau of the Republic of Macedonia and the UNMIK resolves the issue of the Republic of Macedonia’s accepting the validity of insurance policies for passenger vehicles of citizens of Kosovo and vice versa (mutual recognition of vehicle insurance policies).  The Memorandum of Understanding between the Customs Administrations of the Republic of Macedonia and the UNMIK was signed in June 2000. In November 2002, the Interim Agreement on Police Cooperation was signed between the Ministry of Internal Affairs of the Republic of Macedonia and the UNMIK, establishing a permanent channel of information exchange on the fight against organised crime, illicit trafficking in human beings, arms and drugs, money laundering etc. In May 2003, the Republic of Macedonia and the UNMIK signed an Interim Agreement on Opening Provisional (seasonal) Border Crossing Points in the part of Kosovo- Tanuševci-Debalde and Strezimir-Restelica-, as well as a Memorandum defining the practical details on the opening of border crossings for cross-border traffic between the Republic of Macedonia and Serbia and Montenegro, which also covers the border crossing points towards Kosovo.  In June 2004, an Interim Protocol on Cooperation between the Ministry of Education of the Republic of Macedonia and the UNMIK on cooperation in the areas of education and science was signed. In November 2004, an Interim Protocol on Transfer of Convicted Persons was signed. The procedure for regulation of the following issues has been initiated: free trade, avoiding double taxation and investments protection, and cooperation in the field of healthcare.  
ROMANIA 
Political Relations between the Republic of Macedonia and Romania are featured by high-level friendship and mutual respect, concurring positions with respect to developing regional cooperation, a shared commitment to join the EU, as well as a joint Euro-Atlantic orientation. The political dialogue is continuous and is conducted at all levels, both bilaterally and multilaterally.  
Bilateral Agreements. The Republic of Macedonia and Romania signed an Agreement on Friendship and Cooperation in 2001. The contractual regulation of cooperation in areas of mutual interest remains one of priority tasks for both countries (for more details see 27_ Annex_01).  
Economic Cooperation is not at the satisfactory level, in terms of volume and quality, and is mainly reduced to trade, which in the last period has had a decreasing trend. 2004 is an exception, in light of the fact that in the first nine months there is a progressive trend especially in terms of import. The Republic of Macedonia and Romania have signed a Free Trade Agreement, which is expected to encourage increasing of the trade volume and the level of economic relations (for more details see Table at the end of the answer).   
Cooperation in Other Areas. The experiences in the cooperation in the field of defence are positive, while the Agreement on Cooperation in the Area of Defence that the two countries signed (in May 2004) is expected to give an additional impetus in this respect. The two countries participate in the Multinational Regional Peace Operations Unit. Romania has offered assistance for education and training of Macedonian officers at its military education system.  The justice and home affairs cooperation, especially after the signing of agreements in these fields, has been accelerated and is successfully pursued. Furthermore, mutual cooperation is successful within the SECI Centre for Fight against Organised Crime, seated in Bucharest.  A Macedonian Language and Literature Desk has been functioning at the Craiova University for a longer period of time, while at the Ss. Cyril and Methodius University in Skopje there is a Romanian Language Desk. Initiatives for twinning of the Ss. Cyril and Methodius University and the Constance University, as well as for cooperation between the Academies of Arts and Sciences have been announced.  The cooperation between the Ministries of Foreign Affairs of the Republic of Macedonia and of Romania on consular affairs is without any specific problems and is in line with bilateral and international conventions. The procedure for opening of the Honorary Consulate of Romania, seated in Bitola and a Cultural Centre of Romania in the Republic of Macedonia is under way.  
Regional and Multilateral Cooperation. The two countries successfully cooperate within the UN, Council of Europe, and the OSCE and within regional initiatives.  
REPUBLIC OF TURKEY 
Political Relations. The Republic of Macedonia and the Republic of Turkey have traditionally good and stable relations, complemented with high level of friendship and mutual respect. In the last period, visits at all levels (including the highest) have been exchanged, in all areas. Turkey has been continuously supporting the Republic of Macedonia in its efforts for membership of NATO and of the EU.  
Bilateral relations. The Republic of Macedonia and the Republic of Turkey have signed 32 Agreements, protocols and other documents (for more details see 27_Annex_01).  
Economic Cooperation. Concluding the Agreement on Trade and Economic Cooperation in March 1994, and signing the Free Trade Agreement, applied as of 01.09.2000, the Republic of Macedonia and Turkey established the legal framework for the promotion of their trade and economic relations. Turkey is the eighth ranked trading partner in terms of volume of the trade with the Republic of Macedonia, with a 3.3% share in the total foreign trade. The Republic of Macedonia has had a deficit in the trade with the Republic of Turkey for several years. In the nine months of 2004, there is an increasing trend in the exports from the Republic of Macedonia, indicating a tendency towards a more balanced trade. The opportunities for economic cooperation have not been sufficiently explored. Hence, both countries make efforts to enhance and enlarge the cooperation in this field (for more details see Table at the end of the answer) 
Cooperation in Other Areas. The cultural cooperation between the two countries has been contractually regulated and is intensive and diverse. The successful cooperation between Macedonian and Turkish publishers, as well as between the associations of writers continues. A large number of art exhibitions, participation in folklore festivals, and other types of cultural exchange between the two countries have been organised.  The cooperation in the defence field is especially intensive and diverse. The Ministries of Defence of the two countries have a regular dialogue at all levels, including at the ministerial level. The Republic of Turkey was the first country to sign a Cooperation Agreement (1994) in this field with the Republic of Macedonia and accepted officers for education. Observers of military exercises have been sent to the Republic of Turkey, and Turkey has donated assistance for the equipping of the Army of the Republic of Macedonia. The total assistance value is more than 7, 81 million EUR.  In the context of home affairs, a Protocol on Cooperation between the respective Ministries was signed (May 1992). An initiative has been raised for signing a Readmission Agreement. There is also fruitful cooperation in the fight against organised crime, illicit trafficking in drugs, arms, and against smuggling of excise and other types of goods, ordinary forms of crime, etc.  The cooperation in the field of transport is very successful. The bilateral and transit goods transport is not under a license requirement, while scheduled line passenger transport and transit is conducted with licence requirement.  The two countries continuously cooperate in the field of education under the Protocol the Governments signed in 1994 and under the Agreement for Mutual Recognition of the Degrees and the Diplomas, Scientific Degrees and Titles Accomplished in Republic of Turkey and Republic of Macedonia signed in 1998. The Istanbul University and the Ss. Cyril and Methodius University in Skopje have established cooperation. At the Debiyat Faculty at the Istanbul University there is a Macedonian Language and Literature Desk. There has been also cooperation established between the St. Kliment Ohridski University from Bitola and the Gazi University in Ankara.  
Regional and Multilateral Cooperation. The Republic of Macedonia and the Republic of Turkey have excellent cooperation within international organisations and associations, especially under the UN, OSCE, Council of Europe, and within regional initiatives.  
REPUBLIC OF CROATIA  
Political Relations. The cooperation between the Republic of Macedonia and the Republic of Croatia is successfully pursued, accompanied with a shared interest in further advancement of the relations. The countries have identical or close positions on many important issues of bilateral, regional and international character.  Additional impetus to the dynamic political dialogue and overall cooperation is given by the frequent meetings of the Heads of State, Ministers of Foreign Affairs, and contacts in other fields. The two countries share the strategic commitment to integration in the EU and NATO.  The Republic of Macedonia has welcomed the Republic of Croatia acquiring the status of a candidate for EU membership and has on several occasions underlined that this sets a good example for the other countries in the Region. The Republic of Macedonia and the Republic of Croatia have signed an Agreement on Cooperation in the context of the Rapprochement and Accession to the EU, in accordance with the obligations under the Stabilisation and Association Agreement.  
Bilateral Agreements. The two countries have signed 21 inter-state agreements and one protocol, establishing thus the legal framework for successful cooperation. Agreements in the field of payment operations, on cooperation between information agencies, employment of labour, cooperation in the healthcare and medicine and in other fields are planned to be concluded in the forthcoming period. (for more details see 27_Annex_ 01).  
Economic Cooperation. The cooperation in this field is regulated by the Free Trade Agreement, concluded in May 1997, amended and supplemented in 2002.  Croatia is the ninth ranked trading partner of the Republic of Macedonia, having a 3.2% share in the total foreign trade. The trade between the two countries is almost totally balanced, featured, but not burdened, by a slight surplus. There are possibilities to enlarge and enhance the economic cooperation, following the jointly expressed commitments of the two countries in this context (for more details see Table at the end of the answer).  
Cooperation in Other Areas. The Republic of Macedonia and the Republic of Croatia successfully cooperate in the fields of parliamentary exchange, justice and home affairs, defence, culture, and education. The two countries directly cooperate in the fight against organised crime, illicit trafficking in drugs, arms, human beings, against prostitution.  The Agreement on Cultural Cooperation between the two countries was signed in 1995, and in May 2002, in the course of the event “Days of Croatian Culture in the Republic of Macedonia” the 2002, 2003 and 2004 Cultural Cooperation Programmes were signed. The Macedonian cultural associations in the Republic of Croatia give their contribution to the close cultural relations, assisted significantly by the Croatian state and local authorities.  In context of the educational and scientific cooperation, Macedonian Language Desks successfully work in Zagreb, Rijeka, Osijek and Zadar, and vice versa in Skopje. The Universities of Macedonia and Croatia have successful cooperation, as well.  The road, air and postal traffic between the two countries are also successful. Freight transport is under licence requirement, which are regularly issued by both countries.  The Republic of Macedonia and the Republic of Croatia have concluded an Agreement for Legal Assistance in Criminal Law Matters.  A Memorandum of Cooperation in Process of European Integration was signed on 15.03.2003. 
Regional and Multilateral Cooperation. The two countries successfully cooperate within the UN, OSCE and the Council of Europe, and at the regional level.     

BOSNIA AND HERZEGOVINA 
Political Relations. The relations between the Republic of Macedonia and Bosnia and Herzegovina are friendly and characterised by high level of mutual understanding. The two countries established diplomatic relations in 1993. However, the war in Bosnia and Herzegovina had a negative impact on the development of the cooperation. More intensive political, economic, cultural and other contacts were lacking despite the good political relations and the fact that there are no open issues between the two countries.  Bilateral Agreements. Thus far, the two countries have signed several inter-state agreements. Currently, texts of several agreements are harmonised, expected to be signed in the near future. (for more details see 27_Annex_01
Economic Cooperation. The cooperation does not correspond with the possibilities of the two countries. Bosnia, having a 1.1% share in the total foreign trade of the Republic of Macedonia is among countries with which there are opportunities to enhance the trade and the overall economic cooperation. The realisation of the commitment of the two countries to developing, advancing and increasing the economic cooperation is facilitated by the conclusion and application of the Free Trade Agreement (entered into force on 01.09.2002). (for more details see Table at the end of the answer).  Regional and Multilateral Cooperation. The two countries successfully cooperate multilaterally and under regional initiatives.  
REPUBLIC OF SLOVENIA 
Political relations between the Republic of Macedonia and the Republic of Slovenia are very friendly; there are no open issues. The established cooperation is featured with continuous political dialogue, frequent visits at all levels and a concrete demonstration of the support by Slovenia in the integration of the Republic of Macedonia into the EU. 
Bilateral Agreements. The successful cooperation between the two countries is based on the provisions regulating relations in specific fields- 23 agreements in total, three protocols, 2 memoranda (for more details see 27_Annex_01).  
Economic Cooperation. The predominant form in the intensive economic cooperation between the Republic of Macedonia and the Republic of Slovenia is trade. Slovenia is the seventh ranked trading partner of the Republic of Macedonia, having a 3.9% share in the total foreign trade. The trade is featured by an evident deficit, to which the Republic of Macedonia pays special attention. In this context, there is a positive trend of increase of the exports from the Republic of Macedonia in the first nine months of 2004. The intensification of the economic cooperation is expected to alleviate the trade deficit. (for more details see Table at the end of the answer).  There are about 70 mixed Macedonian-Slovenian companies operating in the Republic of Macedonia and 25 with foreign - Slovenian capital share higher than 51%.  
Cooperation in other areas. The two countries successfully cooperate in the fields of: justice and home affairs, defence, culture, education, science, finances, healthcare, environmental protection and in other areas in line with the agreements between the two countries related to specific areas.  The relevant departments of the respective Ministries of the two counties successfully cooperate under the Readmission Agreement, i.e. the cooperation between Interpol services and the administrative services of the two countries’ respective Ministries of Internal Affairs yields positive results.  A Memorandum of Understanding between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Slovenia on the Technical Assistance in the area of European Affairs was signed on 02.04 2003.  
Multilateral and Regional Cooperation. The two countries successfully cooperate within the UN, OSCE, Council of Europe, and regional initiatives. 
COOPERATION UNDER REGIONAL INITIATIVES AND ORGANISATIONS 
The Republic of Macedonia actively contributes towards building relations of good-neighbourliness, security, stability and cooperation in South-Eastern Europe. It furthermore participates in the existing regional cooperation initiatives and intensifies its role in the overall engagement of South-East Europe for its European and Euro-Atlantic integration. The Republic of Macedonia is a fully-fledged Member State of the South-East European Cooperation Process, Central European Initiative, Stability Pact, while the procedure for fully-fledged membership of the Organisation of the Black Sea Economic Cooperation is under way, and in the Adriatic-Ionian Initiative, the Danube and the Szeged Process, the Republic of Macedonia has an observer status. Some of the regional cooperation activities are related to trilateral meetings at valorous levels, as well as to Euro-Regions, as elaborated in the previous section on bilateral relations.  It is in this spirit that the Republic of Macedonia has initiated new forms of regional cooperation, such as the informal meeting of the Ministers of Foreign Affairs of the five Stabilisation and Association Process countries, at which the Minister of Foreign Affairs of France also took part (15-16.10.2004, Ohrid).  As of 1993, under the I Committee of the United Nations General Assembly the Republic of Macedonia has been the sponsor of activities for adoption of a Resolution for maintaining international peace and security, good-neighbourliness, stability and development of South-East Europe, co-sponsored by the countries in the Region and the EU Member-States. Such a Resolution was adopted at the last 59 Session of the United Nations General Assembly.  Following the United Nations General Assembly Resolution 53/22 of 1998, under which 2001 was proclaimed a year of “Dialogue Among Civilisations”, the Republic of Macedonia was the initiator and host of the Regional Forum entitled “Dialogue among Civilisations”, organised, under the auspices of the President of the Republic of Macedonia, in cooperation with the UNESCO and the Appeal of Conscience Foundation. The Heads of State of seven countries from South-East Europe, representatives of the UN, the EU and other international institutions and non-governmental organizations took part in the Forum. The Joint Document adopted at the Forum – “Message from Ohrid “- is expected to contribute to grater understanding and respect for cultural, ethnic and religious diversities among civilisations, especially in South-East Europe, encouraging at the same time the dialogue in other regions in Europe and worldwide.  
South East European Cooperation Process (SEECP) 
The Republic of Macedonia is a Member State of the SEECP, the only autochthonous regional initiative, ever since the establishment of the Process in June 1996, in Sofia. The Republic of Macedonia is actively engaged on the establishment of harmonised positions of the countries in the Region in enhancing cooperation and stability in the Balkans, in order to transform the Region into a region of peace, security, stability and cooperation.  The Republic of Macedonia endeavours for realisation of the agreed joint activities defined in the Action Plan on Regional Economic Cooperation, adopted in Skopje, in February 2001. The Republic of Macedonia is actively involved in the cooperation in the field of justice and home affairs and in the fight against organised crime, being also engaged on the parliamentary cooperation.  The Republic of Macedonia chaired the SEECP from 2000 to 2001, when it organised meetings of Ministers of Foreign Affairs (Ohrid, 14.07.2000) and two Summits - one informal on 25.10.2000, and one formal in Skopje, on 23.02.2001.  Taking into consideration the order of Member-States, the next Republic of Macedonia SEECP chairmanship will be in 2008/2009.  
Stability Pact for South Eastern Europe (SP for SEE) 
Following its strategic priorities, ever since its launching, the Republic of Macedonia actively supported the establishment of the Stability Pact for South-Eastern Europe and continues to actively participate in the Stability Pact bodies. The pro-active approach and the enhanced engagement are especially evident in 2004, which has resulted in several initiatives and implementation of specific projects. In recognition of its overall activities under the SP and in the promotion of regional cooperation, it was decided that the Republic of Macedonia would host the annual meetings of the three SP Working Tables and of the SP Regional Table on 17-19.03.2004, in Skopje.  The Republic of Macedonia co-chaired the SP I Working Table (Democracy and Human Rights) in the period from January to June 2001, was the regional coordinator of the SEE Women MP’s Club project in 2003/2004, within the Table’s parliamentary cooperation. In terms of cross-border cooperation, the country pursues intensive activities in connection with the Euro-region Skopje-Niš-Sofia and specifically under the micro-regions Kumanovo-Gnjilane-Preševo and the Belasica Euro-Region. The Statute of the Ohrid-Prespa Euro-region is planned to be signed in the first half of 2005. In the field of the media, the new Broadcasting Law is in the drafting procedure. In 2004/2005, Macedonia will provide services as the Secretariat of the Network of National Associations of Local Authorities in South-East Europe (NALAS).  The Republic of Macedonia co-chaired the II Working Table (Economic Reconstruction, Development and Cooperation) from July to December 2001, and as the initiator, founder and Chair of the Working Group on Trade Liberalisation in 2000-2003 period, the Republic of Macedonia signed and ratified Free Trade agreements with all countries in South-East Europe. The Republic of Macedonia attaches great importance to the construction and modernisation of the Pan-European Corridors 8 and 10, especially Corridor 8, and has signed the Memorandum of Understanding on the Basic Transport Network in South-East Europe. As a Signatory to the Memorandum of Understanding on the Regional Electricity Market in South East Europe and its Integration into the European Union Internal Electricity Market, the Republic of Macedonia supports the establishment of a South-East Europe Energy Community (ECSEE) and participates in the negotiations for the signing of the Treaty on the Energy Community with the EU. The Republic of Macedonia will be the host of the future Regional Centre on Social Policy and is currently holding the Chairmanship of the Executive Board of the Healthcare Network of South-East European Countries - 2004/2005.  The Republic of Macedonia is the current Co-chair of the III Working Table (Security issues) July 2004- July 2005. The seat of the regional MARRI Centre of the Migration, Asylum and Refuges Initiative is in Skopje and the Centre has been functioning since 01.01.2005. In the context of the fight against organised crime and corruption, the initiative of the Public Prosecutor’s Office of the Republic of Macedonia for the Stabilisation and Association Process countries signing a Memorandum of Understanding on Regional Cooperation of the Public Prosecutor’s Offices is being realised. The Republic of Macedonia is also pursuing cooperation on border issues within the Ohrid Border Process.  
Central European Initiative (CEI)  
The Republic of Macedonia applied for membership of the Central European Initiative (CEI) in May 1993, and at the CEI Summit of Heads of Government, held in July 1993, in Budapest, it become a fully-fledged Member State.  The Republic of Macedonia hosted the First Ministerial Conference–Ministers of Foreign Trade of the CEI Member-States, in March 1995, in Skopje.  In December 1997, the Republic of Macedonia hosted one of the meetings of the Working Group on Minorities, signing as well the Instrument on Protection of Minority Rights in CEI Member-States. It furthermore chairs the Working Group on Youth, in the framework of which, several projects in the field of youth cooperation among CEI Member-States have been realised.  The Republic of Macedonia had the Presidency of the CEI in 2002. In the course of its Presidency, the Republic of Macedonia organised a series of events: the Skopje Summit of 21.11.2002, the V Economic Forum, a meeting of Ministers of Media and Information in May 2002, in Belgrade, but organised and initiated by the Republic of Macedonia, the then CEI Chair.  The Republic of Macedonia stands for strengthening the CEI economic dimension through realisation and implementation of certain priority project of interest for the Region overall. In 2002, in Skopje, a Business Centre for assistance to small and medium sized enterprises was opened. Currently three major projects are realised for which the funding has already been approved: the CEI Office-Business Service in Skopje; two year technical assistance programme for upgrading the air-navigation system in the Republic of Macedonia; two year assistance programme for maintaining the Skopje bypass and part of the road network from the village of Smokvica to Gevgelija. Furthermore, funds have been approved for support of the water supply network in Bitola.  The Republic of Macedonia has representatives in all working groups of the Initiative and co-chairs the Working Groups on Youth and Sports, on Small and Medium Sized Enterprises and on Tourism. The Republic of Macedonia presented its nomination for co-chairmanship of the Working Group of the newly established University Network, the members of which are the Ss. Cyril and Methodius University in Skopje and the South-East Europe University in Tetovo.  
South East European Cooperative Initiative (SECI)  
As a SECI Member State as of the initiative's establishment in 1996, the Republic of Macedonia has been actively participating in its work.  The Republic of Macedonia is responsible for two projects: a) on aligning and standardisation of the energy systems in the Region and b) on inter-connectivity of the electric power systems aimed at better and prompter integration into the EU systems.  The Republic of Macedonia has its representatives - liaison officers from the Ministry of the Interior and the Customs Administration at the SECI Regional Centre for Combating Trans- Border Crime in Bucharest. Furthermore, the country participates in the work of the Joint Consultative Committee and in other SECI Projects: transport and trade facilitation in South-East Europe (TTFSE) and the Pro-Committees (MACPRO) represented by the Chamber of Commerce of the Republic of Macedonia.  
Organisation of the Black Sea Economic Cooperation (OBSEC) 
The Republic of Macedonia submitted a formal request for membership in 1993, to which a positive response was received, in April 2003, in Yerevan, Armenia. However, the accession procedure will be renewed, with a request that the Republic of Macedonia is admitted to membership under its constitutional name.  The Republic of Macedonia participates in several forms of parliamentary cooperation of the OBSEC, upon invitation of the Host-State of the Parliamentary Assembly.  
Adriatic-Ionian Initiative (AII) 
The Republic of Macedonia has an observer status in the Adriatic-Ionian Initiative and is occasionally invited to participate at expert level in Working Meetings on Fight against Organised Crime, Economy, and Transport).  
Adriatic Partnership Charter  
Pursuing its commitments to promoting regional cooperation, especially in defence and security, the Republic of Macedonia signed the Partnership Charter (along with Albania, Croatia and the USA) on 02.05.2003, in Tirana. In this context, the Republic of Macedonia endeavours to accomplish the Partnership Charter goals, primarily in terms of accelerating the democratic, economic and military reforms, important for integration of the three countries in the European and Euro-Atlantic structures.  In the first half of 2004, the Republic of Macedonia was the coordinator of activities under the Charter and hosted the second meeting of the Partnership Commission for the Implementation of the Charter, held on 19 and 20.05.2004, in Skopje.  On the eve of the Istanbul NATO Summit, for the first time, the Ministers of Foreign Affairs of the three Charter Countries together met the NATO North-Atlantic Council, presenting their unison positions and thus confirming their firm commitments to reach the shared goal of NATO membership.  The Republic of Macedonia and the Charter Partners unequivocally support Serbia and Montenegro and Bosnia and Herzegovina in their efforts for European and Euro-Atlantic integration and in this respect they invite the Ministers of Foreign Affairs of these two countries at the Charter meetings.  
South East Defence Ministerial (SEDM)  
The Republic of Macedonia has actively participated in the SEDM. It organised the signing of the Agreement on the Multinational Peace Forces of South-Eastern Europe (MNPFSEE) by the Ministers of Defence of Albania, Bulgaria, Greece, Italy, Macedonia, Romania, and Turkey on 26.09.1998, in Skopje.  The Republic of Macedonia regularly attends the annual meetings of Ministers of Defence and Deputy Chiefs of General Staff. It is planned that the country chairs the Political-Military Steering Committee and the Coordinative Committee as of August 2006. The Republic of Macedonia offered to be the host of the exercise South-East Europe Simulation Network (SEESIM) in 2006.  The Republic of Macedonia is a Member State of the South-East European Brigade (SEEBRIG) established by the seven SEDM countries and has expressed consent for participation of the SEEBRIG in future military missions of the EU, including the forthcoming Althea Mission in Bosnia and Herzegovina.  
NATO South East Europe Initiative (SEEI) 
Under the NATO South East Europe Initiative- SEEI, i.e. through the SEEGRUOP (South East Security Cooperation Steering Group), the Republic of Macedonia continues to be actively involved in advancing regional cooperation and coordination among countries of South-East Europe on security related issues of common interest. In the course of the Republic of Macedonia’s chairmanship with the SEEGROUP (January 2003-Januray 2004) the activities were focused on the projects: SEESTUDY (Development of a comparative study of the national defence strategies of the countries in the Region) and SEECHANGE (Exchange of political-military and other early warning, conflict prevention and crisis management information), Macedonia being the project leader. In addition the Republic of Macedonia has actively participated in the design of the South East Europe Common Assessment Paper on Regional Security Challenges and Opportunities (SEECAP).  25/53 Export in Euro 000 Index 



Country 2002 Share 2003 Share Index 2003/2002 I-XI 2003 Share I-XI 2004 Share I-XI 2004/I-XI 2003 Republic of Macedonia 1.178.350 100 1.207.126 100 102,4 1.102.208,62 100 1.204.712 100 109,3 Bulgaria 22.957 2,0 22.807 1,9 99,3 20.712 1,9 37.370 3,1 180,4 Albania                                14.447 1,2 15.334 1,3 106,1 13.787 1,3 16.212 1,3 117,6 Serbia and Montenegro 259.691 22,0 241.096 20,0 93,2 222.607 20,2 248.221 20,6 111,5 Slovenia                               22.822 2,0 18.769 1,6 82,4 17.084 1,5 20.688 1,7 121,1 Croatia                                 62.166 5,3 58.318 4,8 93,9 53.177 4,8 58.755 4,9 110,5 Turkey 8.982 0,1 28.912 2,4  321,9 26.087 2,4 40.239 3,3 154,2 Romania                                 1.042 0,0 1.218 0,1 116,9 1.208 0,1 1.350 0,1 111,8 Bosnia and Herzegovina  19.240 1,6 20.905 1,7 108,9 19.345 1,8 24.225 2,0 125,2 
Import in Euro 000 Index 



Country 2002 Share 2003 Share Index 2003/2002 I-XI 2003 Share I-XI 2004 Share I-XI 2004/I-XI 2003 Republic of Macedonia 2.105.964 100 2.032.612 100 96,5 1.853.634 100 2.093.258 100 112,9 Bulgaria 136.119 6,5 131.849 6,5 96,9 122.256 6,6 154.396 7,4 126,3 Albania                                1.177 0,0 3.467 0,2 294,5 3.191 0,2 4.754 0,2 149,0 Serbia and Montenegro 195.494 0,3 187.942 0,2 96,1 172.287 9,3 175.820 8,4 102,1 Slovenia                               136.501 6,5 122.340 6,0 89,6 109.898 5,9 104.485 5,0 95,1 Croatia                                 57.999 2,8 55.969 2,7 96,5 50.533 2,7 47.722 2,3 94,4 Turkey 62.158 3,0 69.797 3,4 112,3 63.909 3,4 67.602 3,2 105,8 Romania                                 10.162 0,5 12.600 0,6 124,0 10.991 0,6 72.367 3,5 658,4 Bosnia and Herzegovina  15.102 0,7 10.354 0,5 68,6 9.463 0,5 11.652 0,6 123,1 Source: State Statistical Office 4. In view of the Union’s commitments in the areas of non-proliferation and export control, it would be useful to know of your country’s participation, or intended participation, in the different international regimes concerning non-proliferation of weapons of mass destruction, exports of conventional arms, small and light arms, and dual use technology, as well as the authorities in charge of implementing these international regimes. 
The Republic of Macedonia has reaffirmed in many different fora its readiness to cooperate with the EU over these issues - bilaterally, as well as in the framework of international organisations (the United Nations - especially the IAEA; OSCE etc.) and regional initiatives. It is committed to improve the implementation of national obligations for preventing proliferation of weapons of mass destruction, nuclear, biological and chemical weapons and systems for their delivery. Hence, at the first Meeting of the RM – EU Stabilisation and Association Council (Brussels, 14.09.2004), the Republic of Macedonia supported the inclusion of a non-proliferation clause in the Stabilisation and Association Agreement.  The Republic of Macedonia is also committed to universalisation of the international instruments in this area through universal adherence by all states; through strengthening the existing regimes and control mechanisms for their verification; and trough promotion of new, more efficient security arrangements and initiatives.  The Republic of Macedonia supports the UN Security Council Resolution 1540 (2004) on Non-proliferation of Weapons of Mass Destruction, which complements the existing international instruments and regimes for preventing proliferation of weapons of mass destruction, especially in respect to non-state entities as perpetrators. The First Report under this Resolution was submitted to the Security Council in November 2004.  The Republic of Macedonia is a Contracting Party to, and actively participates in the activities under the major international instruments on non-proliferation of weapons of mass destruction, as well as on conventional weapons, as follows:   Comprehensive Nuclear-Test- Ban Treaty (CTBT), signed on 29.10.1998, and ratified on 14.03. 2000;    Treaty on Non-Proliferation of Nuclear Weapons (NPT) of 1970, by means of notification of succession of the status of a Contracting Party  of the former  Yugoslavia, on 30.03.1995;    Convention on Physical Protection of Nuclear Material, by means of notification of succession of the status of a Contracting Party of the former  Yugoslavia ,on 20.09.1996,   Convention on the Prohibition of the Development, Production, Stockpiling and Use of Chemical Weapons and on their Destruction (CWC), to which it acceded on 20.06.1997.   Convention on the Prohibition of the Development, Production and Stockpiling of Bacteriological (Biological) and Toxin Weapons and on their Destruction (BWC) of 1972, by means of notification of succession of the status of a Contracting Party of the former Yugoslavia;   Convention on Prohibitions or Restrictions on the Use of Certain Conventional Weapons which may be deemed to be Excessively Injurious or to have Indiscriminate Effects, with its Protocols (P. I, II, III), by means of notification of the status of a Contracting Party of the former Yugoslavia , on 30.12.1996; and   Convention on the Prohibition of the Use, Stockpiling, Production and Transfer of Anti-Personnel Mines and on their Destruction (Ottawa Convention), to which it acceded on 09.09.1998.  
Implementation: 
For more details on the implementation of the Conventions on Nuclear Non-Proliferation see answers 27_B_05 and 27_B_06The Government of the Republic of Macedonia in June 2003 made a Declaration, committing itself to unilaterally adhere to the Guidelines for Sensitive Missile-Relevant Transfers of the Missile Technology Control Regime (M.T.C.R.), and the Equipment, Software and Technology Annex. As the first step, the Government decided that the equipment and technology subject to the M.T.C.R. shall be placed under a special licence regime. There is an ongoing process of revision of the existent national legislation. A Draft Law on Control of Export of Dual-Use Goods and Technology was prepared under the responsibility of the Ministry of Economy (for more details see answer 27_B_6). Within its participation in the EU Common Foreign and Security Policy, the Republic of Macedonia associated itself with the EU Statement at the MTCR Plenary Session (Seoul, 4-8.10. 2004). The Ministry of Foreign Affairs expressed political support to the new Proliferation Security Initiative (PSI) launched by the United States (May 2003). The responsible authorities were called upon to conduct evaluation, each within their area of competence, of existing institutional framework and capacities and to identify potential shortcomings for the implementation, at national level, of the so-called Interdiction Principles of the Initiative. A delegation of the Republic of Macedonia participated in the Meeting-Ceremony marking the First Anniversary of the Initiative (Krakow, Poland, June 2004).  Concerning the Convention on Prohibition of Development, Production, Stockpiling and Use of Chemical Weapons and Their Destruction (CWC), progress has been made in the implementation of the Convention’s obligations at national level. On 24.02.2003, the Government adopted a Decision establishing a National Body with representatives from the Ministry of Foreign Affairs, Ministry of the Interior, Ministry of Defence, Ministry of Health, Ministry of Economy, Ministry of Justice, Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning, Ministry of Finances, Ministry of Transport and Communications, Ministry of Education and Science, and the Customs Administration. The Ministry of Foreign Affairs and the Ministry of Health coordinate the National Body. The National Body focused its initial activities on the introduction of national measures for implementation of the Convention in accordance with its Article VII. To this end, a new article was introduced in the Criminal Code (Article 407b), which incriminates the abuse of chemical and biological weapons (Official Gazette of the RM No. 19/04). The Republic of Macedonia will provide the implementation of the Convention in the national legislation in the course of 2005 thus fulfilling an important obligation from the Action Plan for implementation of the obligations under article VII of the Convention adopted at the VIII Conference of the States parties to the Convention in October 2003. In cooperation with the OPCW, a seminar on the implementation of the obligations from the Convention at national level was held in Skopje in January 2004. The first industry declarations were submitted (March 2004), and a positive answer was given to the request for consecutive inspections in relation to Article VI of the Convention. An Operational Plan is currently being developed for hosting of eventual inspections of the OPCW, thus envisaging concrete obligations and responsibilities for the responsible authorities. The Republic of Macedonia, also, has paid its contribution to the Voluntary Assistance Fund. In support of the Convention and the OPCW, the Minister of Foreign Affairs in June 2004, visited the Headquarters of the Organisation and held a meeting with its Director- General.  The Republic of Macedonia is a Signatory to the Hague Code of Conduct against Ballistic Missile Proliferation (HCOC) of November 2002.  As a Contracting Party to the Ottawa Convetion, by the disposal (on 20.02.2003 at the training field “Krivolak”), of the remaining 16.071 pieces of APL’s, out of the total of 38.921 pieces disposed of since 08.06.2000 and retaining 4000 peaces solely for training purposes, the Republic of Macedonia fulfilled its obligation under Article 4 of the Convention. Throughout the process of destruction Progress Reports were regularly submitted to the UN Secretary General, and the Final Report was also submitted pursuant to Article 7 of the Convention. Concerning demining, this process is planned to be completed by the end of 2004. The activities will however continue for the disposal of unexploded ordinances from the First and Second World War.   The Republic of Macedonia submits reports to the UN Register of Conventional Weapons on a regular basis.  The Government endorses and implements the UN Action Program to Prevent, Combat and Eradicate Illicit Trade in Small Arms and Light Weapons, the OSCE Document on Small Arms and Light Weapons and the Regional Implementation Plan on Combating Proliferation of Small Arms and Light Weapons of the SEE Stability Pact. For the purpose of their implementation, and on the basis of these documents, the Ministry of the Interior developed a Draft National Strategy and Draft Action Plan for Control of Small Arms and Light Weapons. Adoption of the National Strategy is planned for the beginning of 2005. At the same time, a national contact point, that participates in all international fora related to the control of small arms and light weapons, and is in charge of taking initiative at operational level in accordance with international standards was established.  The Ministry of the Interior prepared a Report on the Implementation of the UN Action Program to Prevent, Combat and Eradicate the Illicit Trade in Small Arms and Light Weapons in July 2001, which was submitted to the UN Secretariat. The Report contains detailed information on the measures and activities that the Government of the Republic of Macedonia undertook in this area.  Last year, after the adoption of the Law on Voluntary Handover of Weapons, Ammunitions and Explosive Material and Legalisation of Weapons (Official Gazette of the RM Nos. 37/03 and 09/04), the Republic of Macedonia, in cooperation with the UNDP, conducted a campaign for collection of this type of weapons, for which a National Programme was also prepared. The campaign was assessed as generally successful; 7571 pieces of weapons were collected and 5204 applications for legalisation were submitted.   In June 2004, a Seminar was organised in the Republic of Macedonia on the Implementation of the OSCE Best Practices Handbook for Small Arms and Light Weapons.  Underway are inter-ministerial consultations for accession to the Protocol against Illegal Production and Smuggling of Small Arms, Parts and Components thereof, and Ammunitions, to the UN Convention against Transnational Organised Crime. On 01.11.2004, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia adopted a Decision on Unilateral Acceptance of the Principles and Criteria of the EU Code on Arms Exports. In the course of 2005, the Government intends to adopt the Common Position 2003/468/CFSP of 23.06.2003 on the Control of Arms Brokering.  At the beginning of 2005, accession is planned to the EU Programme for Prevention and Fight Against Illegal Trafficking with Convetional Weapons (adopted on 26.06.1997) and adoption of the EU Joint Action 2002/589/CFSP on the EU Contribution to Combating the Destabalising Accumulation and Spread of Small Arms and Light Weapons. 
5. How does your country participate in the cooperation under the following instruments: - Non-Proliferation Treaty; - Statute of the International Atomic Energy Agency, Nuclear Safeguards, and Protocol on Safeguards for NPNW; - Nuclear Safety Convention; - Comprehensive Nuclear Test Ban Treaty; - Physical Protection of Nuclear Materials Convention? 
The Republic of Macedonia is a Contracting Party of the Nuclear Non-Proliferation Treaty (NPT), by means of notification of succession of that status from the former Yugoslavia as of 30.03.1995. The Republic of Macedonia is a non-nuclear state and abides by the principles of non-proliferation and non-acquisition of nuclear material or equipment, which could be used for production of nuclear weapons.  In regard to Article 7 of the NPT, the Republic of Macedonia supports the maintenance of the extant and the establishment of new nuclear weapons-free zones in different parts of the World, provided that these initiatives derive from and are endorsed by the countries to which the initiatives relate, provided that their establishment is not in collision with the existing or developing security arrangements; and finally, if it is not detrimental to the regional or international security; and does not threaten the right of countries to individual or collective self defence in accordance with Article 51 of the UN Charter. The Republic of Macedonia concluded an Agreement on Accepting the Monitoring Mechanisms for Verification of Compliance with the International Obligations on Non-usage of Nuclear Programmes for Developing Nuclear Weapons with IAE (IAEA Safeguards Agreement), in force as of 16.04.2002.  The Republic of Macedonia has not yet concluded the Additional Protocol (model) to the Safeguard Agreement, the objective of which is the establishment of legal basis for inspections by the IAEA and immediate access to information and to declared or undeclared nuclear installations or any other site where presence of nuclear material is possible. In December 2004 the Ministry of Foreign Affairs initiated a procedure with other responsible Ministries for concluding this Protocol with the view of completing the procedure in the second half of 2005.  The Republic of Macedonia adhered to the Statute of IAEA by means of succession from the former Yugoslavia, with validity as of 17.11.1991.  The Government expressed and on 11.05.2004 notified its political commitment to the Director General of the International Atomic Energy Agency (IAEA) to work towards following the guidelines contained in the IAEA Code of Conduct on the Safety and Security of Radioactive Sources. Inter-departmental evaluation has been initiated on developing efficient national legislation and regulatory system for control of radioactive sources, including the establishment of a system for tracing and identifying radioactive sources, control of access to radioactive sources, enforcement measures, and control of import/export of radioactive sources.  The  Republic of Macedonia is a Contracting Party to the Convention on Physical Protection of Nuclear Materials by means of succession, as of 20.09.1996, with validity as of 17.11.1991. Becoming a Contracting Party to this Convention, Republic of Macedonia undertook the obligation to protect effectively nuclear materials that have been used, stored or transported for peaceful purposes, and not to allow the import, export or transit (transport) of nuclear materials without guarantees that these materials have been protected in compliance with the levels specified in Annex 1 to the Convention.  The Republic of Macedonia is a Member State of the IAEA Emergency Reponses Centre, and at the Ministry of Education and Science a contact point has been appointed in the capacity of National Coordinator for Cooperation of the Republic of Macedonia with the IAEA, who has the responsibility to inform of any type of incident involving radioactive materials. The Law on Radiation Protection and Safety (Official Gazette of the RM No. 48/02) contains punitive clauses for the legal persons acting contrary to the provisions of this Law (Articles 31-33).  Within the State Bureau of Health Protection there is National Register for recording sources of radioactive radiation.  The following laws and regulations contain provisions relevant for the fulfilment of the international obligations of the Republic of Macedonia in respect to protective measures for control of nuclear materials:    Law on Radiation Protection and Safety (Official Gazette of the RM No. 48/02).  For more details see answer 22_II_J_02  Law on Trade (Official Gazette of the RM No. 16/04);    Law on Carriage of Dangerous Goods (Official Gazette of the SFRY, Nos. 27/90 and 45/90 and Official Gazette of the RM Nos. 12/93 and 31/93);    Rulebook on the Manner of Carriage of Dangerous Goods in the Road Traffic (Official Gazette of SFRY No. 82/90 and Official Gazette of the RM Nos. 12/93 and 31/93);    Customs Administration Law  (Official Gazette of the RM No. 46/04);   Decision on Distribution of Goods and Forms of Import and Export (Official Gazette of the RM No. 91/04). For more details see answer 27_B_06Furthermore, the Republic of Macedonia has acceded to the following conventions, which regulate the peaceful use of nuclear energy:  The Vienna Convention on Civil Liability for Nuclear Damage (IAEA:INFCIRC/500/ADD.1); The Convention on Early Notification of Nuclear Accidents (IAEA:INFCIRC/335); and  The Convention on Assistance in Case of a Nuclear Accident or Radiological Emergency (IAEA: INFCIRC/336).  The Republic of Macedonia has actively participated in the Regional Programme for technical cooperation with the IAEA in the field of building a national structure (technical capacities and human resources) for implementing efficient control of radioactive sources and radiation protection measures. Furthermore, in each project cycle of the IAEA, the Republic of Macedonia has conducted projects in accordance with the National Framework Programme signed with the IAEA (see Table at the end of the answer).  The Republic of Macedonia as a Contracting Party to the Comprehensive Nuclear Test Ban Treaty (CTBT), signed on 29.10.1998, and ratified on 14.03.2000, has participated in the work of the Preparatory Commission on CTBT and endeavours for earlier entry into force of the Treaty. The outstanding obligations deriving from this Convention will be subject to enhanced engagement in the course of the first half of 2005.  The Republic of Macedonia is not a Contracting Party to the Nuclear Safety Convention. The Ministry of Foreign Affairs in the course of 2005 will conduct inter-departmental consultation on commencing the procedure for accession to the Convention.  
PROJECT ACTIVITIES WITH THE INTERNATIONAL ATOMIC ENERGY AGENCY 1.  NATIONAL PROJECTS 1996-2004  No Project Title Project Institution 1. Doses optimisation of diagnostic radiology in nuclear medicine Radiology Institute  2. National laboratory for calibration and dosimetry State Health Protection Bureau 3. Local production of radio-pharmaceutical drugsInstitute for Pathological and Nuclear Medicine  4. ELISA techniques for eradication of brucellosis and diagnostics of diseases with sheep and cattle Veterinarian Institute 5. Establishment of Centre for Non-Destructive Testing  Faculty of Technology and Metallurgy  6. Improvement of soil fertility and using water resources for yield enhancement.   Faculty of Agriculture 7. Mutation techniques and haloed techniques for improvement of wheat sorts.  Faculty of Agriculture 8. Human resources development  Ministry of Education and Science 9. Storage of unused medical and industry radioactive sources  Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning 10. Gamma cameras and other equipment for introduction of radio-directed surgery Institute of Nuclear Medicine 11. Improvement of ortovoltage therapy Institute of Radiology and Oncology  12. Brachytherapy Institute of Radiology and Oncology 13. Border protection against illicit trade with nuclear and radioactive materials Ministry of the Interior and the Customs Administration of the Republic of Macedonia  

2.  NATIONAL DRAFT PROJECTS FOR THE 2005-2006 CYCLE No Project Title  Project Institution 1. Gamma camera  Medical Centre Bitola 2. Improvement of safe food system (radiological protection GMO testing and control of pesticides) Faculty of Agriculture– Skopje 3. Measuring of dosages with patients in diagnostic radiology Institute of Radiology – Skopje 4. Strengthening the capacities for radiological protection State Health Protection Bureau  5. Improvement of diagnostic procedures in heart diseases Heart Diseases Clinic - Skopje 

3.  PARTICIPATION OF THE REPUBLIC OF MACEDONIA IN THE REGIONAL IAEA COOPERATION  No Project Title Project Institution 1. Improvement of infrastructure for protection of ionising radiation  Ministry of Education and Science  2. Improvement of radiotherapy for treating carcinogenic diseases  Institute of Radiology and Oncology  3. Application of nuclear techniques for the phenomenon of the Prespa Lake with participation of the Republic of Albania and the Republic of Greece Faculty of Technology and Metallurgy 4. Modernisation of equipment for nuclear medicine  Institute for Pathological and Nuclear Medicine 5. Establishment of national information system for nuclear applications - INIS Centre University Library “St. Kliment Ohridski " 
4.  REGIONAL PROJECT FUNDED BY IAEA, Coordinated by the Republic of Macedonia: “Regional control of brucellosis with sheep and goats” coordinated by the Veterinarian Institute – Skopje (participants: Bulgaria, Serbia and Montenegro, Greece, Albania, Bosnia and Herzegovina, Croatia, Turkey, Belarus, Azerbaijan, Malta, Cyprus).  
6. Can you clarify the amount of trade in dual use goods and conventional weapons your country is involved in either directly or as a transit point? What would be the national mechanisms to enact the internal controls necessary to allow instruments such as the Wassenaar Arrangement, the Australia Group and MTCR regimes to function and which would be the relevant law-enforcement agencies for each of these non-proliferation regimes? 
The Republic of Macedonia is not a producer or a direct exporter of conventional weapons as final products (see 27_Annex_07).  The Ministry of Defence is discarding the obsolete small arms and light weapons and ammunition, and upon a decision of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia these are being disposed of. These arms are exported, through agents, for the purpose of converting them into hunting weapons. In the period from 2000 to 2004, 7.9 mm M48 rifles, 7.62 mm M59 semi-automatic rifles, as well as ammunition of same calibres have been exported for the civilian market, mainly in the United States.  Besides gear for personnel ballistic protection (military helmets, protective vests, and plates), the company “Euro-composite” produces, as a cooperative, anti-armour grenades launchers (64 and 90mm). They are temporarily exported to a foreign country (Serbia and Montenegro) and after the completion of the missile fitting; they are again imported as a final product.  The Republic of Macedonia, as has already been said, is not a producer of conventional weapons. It has at disposal obsolete specific military technology and capacities (the ‘Suvenir’ factory) for production of small arms ammunition (7.62 round for ‘Kalashnikov’ 7.62, NATO ball round, 9mm Para) and hand grenades. The company used to be export oriented, but the production hitherto has been only for the needs of the military and the police. Toward the end of September 2004, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, as the owner of the company, took a decision to launch a bankruptcy procedure.  The transit trade exchange of weapons and ammunition is insignificant, mainly related to hunting and small calibre munitions, and authorised companies carry it out. The Ministry of the Interior issues the import/export licences.  The conventional weapons trade (import and export) in the Republic of Macedonia is regulated by the Law on Production and Transfer of Weapons and Military Equipment (Official Gazette of the RM No. 54/02). According to this law, transfer of weapons and military equipment (import/export of weapons and military equipment, semi-final products, components, parts, reproduction materials, raw materials, and other technical means) could be carried out by producers of weapons and military equipment and other companies registered for that kind of trade, only on the basis of previously obtained consent by the Ministry of Economy, if the prescribed conditions are met. The Ministry of Economy keeps a Register of Companies that has been issued licenses to trade with weapons and equipment.  The new Law on Trade (Official Gazette of the RM No. 16/04) in Article 34 stipulates that the Ministry of Defence, or the Ministry of the Interior issues licences for import and export of weapons and military equipment. More precisely, the Government, on the basis of the aforementioned law, has adopted a Decision on the Distribution of Import/Export Goods (Official Gazette of the RM No. 91/04) according to which goods categorised into forms for export and import on the basis of a licence, under the responsibility of the Ministry of Defence (heavy and light weapons and military equipment for its own needs) and the Ministry of the Interior (weapons and explosive materials for commercial purposes) are marked by a mark D7. The Ministry of Defence is authorised to issue licences for the categories and types of goods treated as dual use technology and goods, marked D7* and D7** - reactive engines and their parts (except for turbo-jet) as items for nuclear hardware, machines and mechanical devices of special functions; radars, accessories for radio-navigation and devices for remote radio guidance and aircraft, spaceships and parts thereof. The aforementioned goods and technologies are encompassed by the Wassenaar Arrangement, MTCR regimes and the Nuclear Suppliers Group (NSG). In terms of implementation, with a Decision of the Minister of Defence, a Commission has been established for issuance of licences for import/export comprising experts of the Ministry, who when reviewing the applications pay special attention to the category and type of goods according to the tariff marking and the end use certificate, according to which it is assessed whether the goods in question are goods or technology for dual use and of risk for certain states or regions. The Commission assessment is based upon the provisions of Annex to the Missile Technology Control Regime (MTCR), (the Republic of Macedonia in June 2003 made a Unilateral Statement that it would adhere to it) and the information of the database of the Risk Report of the Wisconsin Project of Nuclear Arms Control of Washington, USA, which is regularly updated. The Commission submits a proposal to the authorised bodies at the Ministry of Defence, for decision on the issuance or non-issuance of a licence. Ever since its establishment in October 2003, the Commission has received only two applications and has replied positively to both.  In accordance with the new Law on Weapons (Official Gazette of the R No.7/05) /previously the Law on Provision, Possession and Carrying of Weapons (Official Gazette of the SRM Nos. 22/81,15/83, 51/88 and Official Gazette of the RM No. 26/93)/ and the Law on Crossing the State Border and Movement in the Border Zone (Official Gazette of the RM Nos. 36/92 and 12/93), the Ministry of the Interior, regulates the transfer, i.e. the import/export and transit of weapons, ammunition and explosive materials, across the state border of the Republic of Macedonia. Within its authority, the Customs Administration of the Republic of Macedonia, performs checks of the licences for export/import issued by the responsible Ministries, as well as comparisons of the quantities and the coincidence of the reported goods placed for customs inspection against the issued licence (see also answer 25_II_17).  Drafting of new legislation is underway, which encompasses the non-proliferation of weapons of mass destruction, as well as the control of trade in dual use goods and technologies. A Draft Law on Export Control of Dual-Use Goods and Technology is being prepared, for which the Ministry of Economy is the lead Ministry. The new legislation will be in accordance with the Community regime (Regulation of the European Council (EC) No. 1334/2000 and the subsequent Amendments to this Regulation 149/2003 and 885/2004 and 1504/2004) for Dual-use goods and Military Goods, which includes the extant international regimes for control of export of conventional and of weapons for mass destruction, as well as of goods and technologies for dual use (Wassenaar Arrangement), the Missile Technology Control Regime (MTCR), the Nuclear Suppliers Group (NSG), the Australian Group and the Chemical Weapons Convention (CWC).  The Republic of Macedonia is not a Contracting Party of the Wassenaar Arrangement and the Australian Group, but there is interest in establishing closer cooperation with these regimes, including fulfilment of membership criteria.  
7. Regarding small arms and light weapons, please provide details on the following issues: (a) Do you have legislation in place for the internal control of small arms and light weapons, including possession, use, carriage and registration of weapons? Do you have legislation in place for external transfers (import, export, transit etc.) of such weapons, in line with the EU Code of Conduct for Arms Exports of 8 June 1998? Do you have any plans to modify the existing legislation? (b) Do you have a national control strategy for small arms and light weapons? If so, please provide a copy. (c) Do you have a national commission or authority to monitor the production, import and export of small arms and light weapons? If so, who are its members and what are its terms of reference? (d) Do you have a national registration system and database for small arms and light weapons? If so, please provide recent weapons registration statistics. (e) Do you have national standards for the movement of ammunition and explosives in accordance with the European Agreement concerning the International Carriage of Dangerous Goods by Road (ADR)? 
a) Laws on internal control of small and light weapons, including possession, use, carriage and registration of weapons  Until the adoption of the new Law on Weapons on 25.01.2005, this field was regulated by the Law on Acquisition, Possession and Carriage of Weapons (Official Gazette of the SRM Nos. 22/81 /consolidated text/ 15/83, 51/88; Official Gazette of the RM Nos. 26/93 and 49/03), as well as the Rulebook on the Form of the Licence for Weapons, Records on Weapons and Ammunition and Keeping of Weapons (Official Gazette of the SRM No. 41/72)  The new Law on Weapons (Official Gazette of the RM No. 07/05) transposed the EU acqis and international standards, and incorporated the best practices from EU countries with regard to weapon control.  This Law stipulates the subject and field of its application. It does not apply to armament and military equipment; to weapons and ammunition purchased and used for the needs of the Ministry of Defence, the Army of the Republic of Macedonia, the Ministry of the Interior, penitentiaries, and other state authorities and legal persons identified in specific regulations.   The Law stipulates that weapons and ammunition, as well as weapon parts may be acquired, possessed and carried only pursuant to the provisions referred to in the Law. These provisions clearly prescribe the conditions for possession and carriage of each type of weapons for legal and natural persons. The said provisions also stipulate that legal persons registered for sale of weapons and ammunition may sell weapons and ammunition only to legal persons and citizens who are in a possession of a licence for acquisition of firearms and ammunition.  The Law defines the term of weapons and introduces the classification of firearms contained in Directive 91/477/EEC (short firearms, long firearms, automatic firearms, semi-automatic firearms, repeating firearms, and single-shot firearms). Pursuant to the Directive 91/477/EEC, weapons have been classified in: prohibited firearms (Category A), firearms which may be purchased on the basis of authorisation (Category B), firearms which may be purchased for the needs of hunting and sports, subject to authorisation issued under mitigating circumstances (Category C), and firearms to be declared and for which authorisation is issued (Category D).  With regard to the ammunition quantity, a distinction is made between the ammunition quantity intended for firearms with smoothbore barrels and non-smooth-bore barrels. The text of the Law also stipulates the obligations of the owner or user of the firearm in regard to its handling and prohibits its carrying in public places.  The cases when weapon authorisation or weapon possession authorisation is withdrawn and annulled are explicitly identified, along with the provisions with regard to handling weapons and ammunition confiscated in criminal and misdemeanour procedures. The issues regarding production, repair and circulation of weapons, ammunition and parts of weapons are systemised in relevant Chapters.  With regard to the transport of weapons and ammunition, the Law contains conditions concerning trade companies involved in transport of passengers and goods that may undertake transport of weapons as well as a provision providing that the regulations concerning explosive materials accordingly apply to the transport of ammunitions.    The Law also defines the conditions with regard to establishing and operation of civilian rifle ranges. - Laws on External Transfers (import, export, transit, and etc.) of these weapons in line with the EU Code of Conduct for Arms Export of 08.06.1998  External transfers (import, export, transit, and etc.) of weapons, ammunition, and explosive materials in the Republic of Macedonia are regulated through the following regulations: The Law on Weapons (Official Gazette of the RM No. 07/25)); the Law on Protection from Explosive Materials  (Official Gazette of the SRM Nos. 4/78; 10/78; 51/88, and 36/90 and Official Gazette of the RM No 12/93, and 31/93); the Law on Crossing the State Border and Movement in the Border Zone (Official Gazette of the RM Nos. 36/92 and 12/93); the Law on Carriage of Dangerous Goods (Official Gazette of the SFRY Nos. 27/90 and 45/90 and the Official Gazette of the RM No. 12/93); the Law on Trade (Official Gazette of the RM No. 16/2004); the Decision on Allocation of Goods to Forms of Export and Import (Official Gazette of the RM No. 91/2004); the Rulebook on the Type of Transport of Dangerous Goods in Land Traffic (Official Gazette of the SFRY Nos. 82/90 and Official Gazette of the RM Nos. 12/93 and 31/93); the List of Explosive Materials to be Placed into Circulation (Official Gazette of the RM Nos. 64/98, 12/2000 and 46/2004).   Having regard to the obligation of the Republic of Macedonia of 01.11.2004 upon the unilateral adoption of the EU Code of Conduct for Arms Export (adopted by the EU Council on 08.06.1998) to adopt and implement the criteria and principles contained in the Code, in the future our State  will evaluate the requests for authorisation regarding export of weapons and military equipment in line with the criteria established by the Code. Within the context of cooperation in the CFSP, The Republic of Macedonia adhered to the Statement of the Luxemburg Presidency at the Meeting for monitoring and marking small and light weapons and prevention illegal trade with small weapons (New York, 24.01. - 05.02.2005) The Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Macedonia, within its competencies, regulates trade, i.e. import, export and transit of weapons, ammunition and explosive materials across the state border of the Republic of Macedonia. It makes decisions upon requests submitted by authorised legal persons through administrative procedure with regard to: trade of weapons and ammunition; trade of explosive materials; supply and transport of explosive materials; supply and transport of weapons and ammunition; matters connected with verification of new kinds of explosive materials.  Pursuant to the Customs Administration Law (Official Gazette of the RM No. 46/04) and Article 10 paragraph 1 Point 9 thereof, the Customs Directorate of the Republic of Macedonia is responsible for control over the export, import and transit of goods with regard to prescribed security measures. In case of small and light weapons for which appropriate measures are anticipated in the applicable laws, customs authorities with regard to these goods do not allow further customs procedure pending provision of prescribed authorisation as an evidence that the goods is in line with anticipated legal conditions.  
- Modification of the existing laws: Since the Law on Weapons has recently been adopted no modification has been anticipated. However, secondary legislation and a National Catalogue are being drafted.   
b) The Republic of Macedonia has drafted National Strategy and Action Plan for control of small and light weapons in line with international documents – Regional Plan for Implementation of the Stability Pact of 2001; Action Program of the United Nations of 2001 and OSCE Document of 2000 for Small and Light Weapons. According to the Plans of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, these documents are expected to be adopted in the first half of 2005. In the meantime, the Republic of Macedonia has appointed a national contact person to participate in all international forums organised with regard to control of small and light weapons, who provides national intervention in line with the international standards.  c) At present in the Republic of Macedonia there is no national committee or body to monitor the production, import and export of small and light weapons. A Proposal has been placed with regard to the set-up of a special body or a committee for control of small and light weapons within the Ministry of the Interior, which shall cooperate with other relevant Ministries regarding this matter. 
d) In the Republic of Macedonia there is a national system for registration and database of small and light weapons. Each registered piece of weapon, pursuant to the provisions, is recorded in the Registry of Permits issued for possession and carriage weapons kept in the local units of the Ministry of the Interior on the basis of natural person’s residence or the seat of the legal entity. The said Registry is kept, by hand, on the base of the type, mark and calibre of the weapon as well as upon the name of the owner in each local unit of the Ministry of the Interior, whose data are entered in the integrated electronic data processing system. 
Current statistics for registered weapons as of 31.12.2004 (source: Ministry of the Interior) Type of weapons 
Hunting rifles  70862 Combined hunting rifles 413 Semi-automatic hunting rifles 138 Hunting carbines  13171 Military rifles 4735 Small-calibre rifles 6201 Small-calibre pistols 621 Pistols and revolvers  56923 Air rifles 4760 Air pistols 271 Semi-automatic battle rifles                1389 Flobers                     12 
e) The Republic of Macedonia has established national standards for ammunition and explosives circulation in line with the European Agreement on International Land Traffic of Dangerous Materials. This matter in the Republic of Macedonia is regulated in line with the following national legislation (laws, rulebooks and other secondary legislation):      The Law on Protection from Explosive Materials (Official Gazette of the SRM Nos. 4/78, 10/78, 51/88 and 36/90, and Official Gazette of the RM Nos. 12/93 and 31/93);    The Law on Trade of Explosive Materials (Official Gazette of the SFRY Nos. 30/85 and 6/89, and Official Gazette of the RM Nos. 12/93 and 31/93);    Law on Carriage of Dangerous Goods (Official Gazette of the SFRY Nos. 27/90 and 45/90 and the Official Gazette of the RM No. 12/93);    The Rulebook on the Means of Transport of Dangerous Goods in the Land Traffic (Official Gazette of the SFRY No. 82/90, and Official Gazette of the RM Nos. 12/93 and 31/93);    The List of Explosive Materials to be Placed into Circulation (Official Gazette of the RM Nos. 64/98, 2/2000 and 46/2004);    The Rulebook on Technical Norms regarding Handling Explosive Materials Used in Mining (Official Gazette of the SFRY Nos. 26/88 and 63/88, and Official Gazette of the RM No. 12/93);    The Rulebook on Security at Work in Production of Explosives and Handling Explosives and Gunpowder (Official Gazette of the SFRY No. 55/69, and Official Gazette of the RM No. 12/93);    The Rulebook on Technical Rules in the Production of Ammonium Nitrate, Handling and Storing Ammonium Nitrate and its Compounds (Official Gazette of the SFRY Nos. 31/61, 13/66 and 27/68, and Official Gazette of the RM No. 12/93);  All these Regulations, and, in particular, the Law on Carriage of Dangerous Goods and the Rulebook on the Means of Transport of Dangerous Goods include Chapters with regard to relevant categories of dangerous materials on the base of their general nomenclature in line with the European Convention regarding International Transport of Dangerous Materials on the Road Transport (ADR). Among these Provisions, as Chapters are distinguished some general and essential provisions with regard to explosive materials (to which, explosives, ammunition and fireworks are included as subcategories), where it is emphasised that the relevant provisions referred to in ADR Convention apply as defined and specific regulations.   The Decision of the Republic of Macedonia to accede to the European Convention regarding International Road Transport of Dangerous Materials ADR) of 1957 was published in the Official Gazette of RM No. 08 on 22.02.1994 and entered into force the next day from its publication in the Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia. This Decision obligated the Ministry of Foreign Relations to notify the ratification to the Agreement Depositary. The implementation and application of the Convention is ensured as follows:    The Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Macedonia as competent authority upon prior activities organised by its professional Sector for Protection against Fires, Explosives and Dangerous Materials, in 1992, issued to the Institute of Vehicles within the Faculty of Mechanical Engineering in Skopje authorisation (license) regarding attesting and issuing ADR certificates (entirely in line with the procedures provided for in ADR) with regard to vehicles for transport of explosives (and combustible) materials;    Under the responsibility of the Ministry of Transport and Communications of the Republic of Macedonia, in line with a Programme, approved in accordance with the Law, courses are held followed by issuance of certificates to drivers of all categories of dangerous goods and amongst for the relevant category – explosive materials;   The Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Macedonia in 1993 (No 26908/1 on 07.06.1993) issued an internal instructional act – Guidelines on Application of the Laws and Other Regulations and Conduct of Procedures with regard to Circulation and Transport of Explosive Materials and Means for their Application, where all ADR provisions are entirely implemented. In line with this instructive act, both the Border Police and the Traffic Police operate on entry in and exit from the Republic of Macedonia as well as control in the traffic of vehicles carrying explosive (dangerous) materials in any circumstances;     The Ministry of the Interior handles procedures, issues authorisations (licenses) regarding each acquisition or transport of explosive materials out of or into the country and within the Republic of Macedonia as well;    An expert Commission was established within the Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Macedonia consisting of internal and external experts, who are engaged in the procedures regarding testing and issuing authorisations (licenses) for production and use of explosive materials intended for economic purposes, entirely applying the relevant ADR provisions (the Convention on the relevant explosive types, which, inter alia, define the conditions with regard to marking, loading, transport, unloading, storing and use of such materials.   
8. In view of the Union’s capacity to implement restrictive measures and economic sanctions under a Joint Action or Common Position (see Articles 14-15 TEU and Articles 60 and 301 TEC), it would be desirable to obtain an overview of your country’s constitutional and legal arrangements for the implementation of restrictive measures and economic sanctions, the relevant administrative structures and monitoring mechanisms, and a list of unilateral and multilateral (in particular UN) restrictive measures and economic sanctions currently applied by your country. Are there any provisions in bilateral or multilateral agreements to which your country is party which would constitute an impediment to the application of restrictions on movement of capital or imports/exports? 
As a Member State of the United Nations since April 1993, the Republic of Macedonia adheres to the Charter of the United Nations, which according to the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia, became a constitutive part of its internal legal order. Consequently, in view of Article 41 of Chapter VII of the Charter of the United Nations, according to which the Member States are obliged to applythe restrictive measures decided upon by the UN Security Council, this presents the basic legal framework for application of UN sanctions and restrictive measures by the Republic of Macedonia.  The competent Ministries and institutions, upon a Decision of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, apply restrictive measures and economic sanctions on the basis of accepted EU Common Position or UN Resolutions. Concerning the issue of adhering to EU Common Positions, Statements, Declarations and Demarches, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, in August 2004 took a Decision that in cases where the restrictive measures are of material effect, i.e. affect the regime of movement of people, goods, services and capital, the Ministry of Foreign Affairs is to timely inform the Government in order to adopt necessary measures for their application by the responsible bodies The Government also decided that these measures are to be published in the Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia.  In such cases, the Ministry of Foreign Affairs, following consultation with other competent bodies, submits a Report to the Government of the Republic of Macedonia with a Draft Decision, imposing obligations on the responsible bodies to undertake appropriate measures in order to implement the Decision. These decisions are published in the Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia. Until the moment of adoption of the Decision by the Government, internationally accepted obligations for implementation of sanctions are applied based on Operative Information of the Ministry of Foreign Affairs to the competent Ministries.  The Ministry of Foreign Affairs, the Ministry of the Interior, the Ministry of Defence, the Ministry of Finance (the Customs Administration and the Directorate for Prevention of Money Laundering), the Ministry of Economy and other Ministries, depending on the character of the sanctions, are responsible for application of restrictive measures and economic sanctions are.  The responsible Ministries act within their authorities defined by the systemic Law on the Organisation of the Operation of State Administration Bodies and the material laws pertinent to the specific fields. They all stipulate conduct of inspection oversight and undertaking of certain concrete measures.  In order to further strengthen the legal basis and to improve the legal mechanism for implementation of internationally accepted obligations for implementation of sanctions and restrictive measures, the Ministry of Foreign Affairs has initiated a procedure for amending relevant legislation in this domain.  Within the process of gradual adoption of the EU acquis in the area of the Common Foreign and Security Policy, the Republic of Macedonia, upon invitation by the EU, as of December 2003, has  adopted and adhered to EU Common Positions, Statements, Declarations and Demarches, including those referring to the application of restrictive measures and sanctions.  The Republic of Macedonia currently applies the following Common Positions:    Common Position on the Application of Specific Measures to Combat Terrorism (2001/931/CFSP);   Council Common Position on Further Measures in Support of the Effective Implementation of the Mandate of the International Criminal Tribunal for the former Yugoslavia (2004/694/CFSP)   Council Common Position concerning Restrictive Measures against Certain Officials of Belarus (2004/661/CFSP);    Council Common Positions concerning Restrictive Measures against the Leadership of the Transnistrian Region of the Moldovan Republic (2004/179/CFSP) and (2004/622/CFSP);   Council Common Position concerning Restrictive Measures against Liberia (2004/137/CFSP);   Council Common Position renewing Restrictive Measures against Zimbabwe (2004/161/CFSP);  In accordance with the relevant Resolutions of the United Nations Security Council, the Republic of Macedonia is currently implementing sanctions and restrictive measures against:    Somalia, established by Resolution 751 (1992);    Rwanda, established by Resolution 918 (1994);    Sierra Leone, established by Resolution 1132 (1997);    Al Qaeda and the Taliban Regime, established by Resolution 1267 (1999);    Former regime of Saddam Hussein in Iraq, in accordance with Resolution 1518 (2003) and Resolution1483 (2003);    Liberia, established by Resolution 1521 (2003) and    Congo, established by Resolution 1533 (2004) and   Cote d’Ivoire, pursuant to Resolution 1572 (2004).  Concerning the implementation of the UN Security Council Resolution 1373 (2001) on Fight Against International Terrorism, the Government, at its session of June 2002 established an Interdepartmental Coordinative Body (comprising representatives of the Ministries of Interior, Defence, Justice, Finance and the Intelligence Agency) on the Implementation of the Obligations Arising from the UNSC Resolution 1373 (2002).  The Republic of Macedonia is not applying any unilateral restrictive measures or economic sanctions.  In the bilateral and multilateral agreements to which the Republic of Macedonia is a party there are no provisions, which would constitute an impediment to the application of restrictions on movement of capital or imports/exports.  
9. Regarding the implementation of sanctions decided by CFSP Common Position or Joint Action (i.e. arms embargoes), which specific agencies (Ministry of Defence, Customs Administration, Ministry of Foreign Affairs, security and intelligence services) or departments would be in charge of the implementation, and what is their operational structure (staffing, budget, reporting)? As an indicator of efficiency, please provide some trade statistics about trade in used or new weapons with countries against which the EU maintains arms embargos. 
Guided by the commitment to support the Common Foreign and Security Policy, the Republic of Macedonia, upon invitation of the European Union, as of December 2003, has adopted and adhered to the Common Positions, Declarations, and Demarches of the European Union including those imposing sanctions and arms embargoes. In this regard, the Republic of Macedonia applies an embargo on arms, ammunition and military equipment against Sudan, in accordance with the Common Position 2004/31/DFSP.  The implementation of EU Common Positions or Joint Actions imposing arms embargoes is under the competence of the Ministry of Foreign Affairs, Ministry of Defence, Ministry of the Interior and the Ministry of Finances/Customs Administration of the Republic of Macedonia.  In such cases, the Ministry of Foreign Affairs, following consultation with other competent bodies, submits a Report to the Government of the Republic of Macedonia with a Draft Decision, imposing obligations on the responsible bodies to undertake appropriate measures in order to implement the Decision. These decisions are published in the Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia. Until the moment of adoption of the Decision by the Government, internationally accepted obligations for implementation of sanctions are applied based on an Operative Information of the Ministry of Foreign Affairs to the competent ministries.   Arms export controls are carried out in accordance with the Decision on the allocation of goods to forms of import and export (Official Gazette of the RM No. 91/04), based on a license issued either by the Ministry of Defence or the Ministry of the Interior, subject to the type and use of the armament. Arms export licenses are issued following an Opinion from the Ministry of Foreign Affairs. Inspections of licences issued by the competent Ministry/Ministries and comparison of the quantity and coincidence of goods reported for scrutiny against the issued licence are pursued by the Customs Administration (the Customs stations). The Customs Administration applies the legally prescribed authorities throughout the customs area of responsibility, which encompass the territory, the territorial waters and the air space, as well as the state border of the Republic of Macedonia.  As part of the process of gradual adoption and introduction of the CFSP acquis  into the national legislation, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia at its session of 01.11.2004 adopted a Decision on Unilateral Acceptance of the European Code of Conduct on Arms Exports. In this context, the Republic of Macedonia, at the beginning of 2005, will start a procedure for acceding to the Common Position of the Council of Europe No. 2003/468/CFSP of 23.06.2003 on the Control of Arms Brokering.  To further improve the legal basis and enhance the legal mechanisms for implementation of internationally accepted obligations for application of sanctions, including arms embargoes, the Ministry of Foreign Affairs has initiated a procedure for amending relevant legislation in this domain.  In the Republic of Macedonia no trade has been registered in new and used weapons with countries against which the EU maintains arms embargos.  The Republic of Macedonia applies the arms embargoes established by the United Nations Security Council Resolutions, in accordance with the previously described mechanism and has not thus far registered any case of violation of the international arms embargoes, introduced against different countries or regions, by sale of used or new weapons.  
10. In view of implementing the Union’s commitments and strengthening its capabilities in the fight against terrorism, it would be useful to receive information about the relevant international conventions signed and ratified by your country and its efforts in the fight against terrorism. 
The Republic of Macedonia is a Contracting Party to the most of the conventions on the Fight against Terrorism, both in the framework of the UN and the Council of Europe (for more details see 27_Annex_08).  With the ratification and the publishing of these international instruments in the Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia, in accordance with the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia, they become part of the national legal order of the Republic of Macedonia. By legal power, they are paramount to the national legislation; i.e. their provisions cannot be changed by law.  Within the United Nations, the Republic of Macedonia has supported the efforts to achieve consensus on the outstanding disputable issues and to finalise the Draft Comprehensive Convention on International Terrorism, as well as the Draft Convention on the Suppression of Acts of Nuclear Terrorism, within the Sixth Committee of the UN General Assembly.  Considering the prospects of its European integration and the importance of international cooperation in the fight against terrorism, the Republic of Macedonia actively follows the measures and initiatives of the EU in this domain. In order to enhance international efforts in this area, the EU Declaration on Combating Terrorism (March 2004) and the EU Strategic Objectives to Combat Terrorism contained therein, envisage, inter alia, inclusion of a counter-terrorism clause in all agreements with third countries. In the context of the First Stabilisation and Association Council Meeting between the Republic of Macedonia and the European Union (Brussels, 14.09.2004), EU suggested introduction of such a clause in the Stabilisation and Association Agreement, which the Republic of Macedonia expressed readiness for.  Following the established practice of adhering to the instruments of the EU Common Foreign and Security Policy, the Republic of Macedonia adhered to the Common Position 2001/931/CFSP on the Application of Specific Measures to Combat Terrorism, as well as to the subsequent Common Positions on Updating the Lists of Individuals, Groups and Entities which the aforementioned Common Position refers to. Obligations undertaken in accordance with these Common Positions are fulfilled by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia through the mechanism described in answers 27_B_08 and 27_B_09.  As a Member State of the OSCE, the Republic of Macedonia has implemented its obligations arising from the Decision and the Action Plan on Fighting Terrorism adopted by the OSCE Council of Ministers in Bucharest.  The Republic of Macedonia is committed to the implementation of the Action Plan for Fighting Terrorism adopted at the Warsaw Conference of the Heads of States of Central, Eastern and South-eastern Europe. The Republic of Macedonia supports the work of, and actively cooperates with the Counter-Terrorism Committee (CTC) of the United Nations Security Council established in accordance with Resolution 1373 (2002).  Hitherto, the Republic of Macedonia submitted to the Committee three (3) reports (initial one on 27.09. 2001 and two additional, on 11.09.2002 and on 27.10.2003), which explain in detail the legislation, measures and activities undertaken by the Republic of Macedonia for suppression of terrorism, for efficient implementation at national level of the obligations arising from Resolution 1373 (2001), paying particular attention to their compliance with the Common Positions of the European Union of 27.12. 2001 and the Council Framework Decision of 13.06.2002 on Joint Action to Combat Terrorism, as well as other subsequent relevant Decisions and Documents of the European Union. Also, the Republic of Macedonia regularly aligns with the common statements and positions of the European Union on this issue in the framework of the United Nations.   Implementing Resolution 1373 (2001), the Republic of Macedonia has undertaken a large number of subsequent activities at political, legislative and operational level.  At political level, first of all, the Republic of Macedonia adhered to the Declaration Concerning the Terrorist Attacks against the United States, adopted at the Extraordinary Session of the United Nations General Assembly on 12.09.2001. The Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia, on 17.09.2001 adopted a Declaration by which it most strongly condemned the terrorist attacks of 11.09.2001 and supported the initiative of the US President for the creation of a global anti-terrorism coalition, thus expressing readiness for cooperation and involvement of the Republic of Macedonia in all activities for suppression of terrorism.  Further on, on 25.09.2001, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia most strongly condemned the terrorist acts and expressed readiness to support the USA, NATO and EU policy for the establishment of a Global Anti Terrorist Coalition, under the umbrella of the United Nations. The Government of the Republic of Macedonia decided to undertake concrete measures in cooperation with relevant international organisations, for the purpose of preventing and suppressing all forms of terrorism, in accordance with the principles of the UN Charter, international law and relevant international instruments. In parallel with amending the legislation in this area, the Government immediately developed regulatory procedures and practice for the fulfilment of the obligations arising from Resolution 1373 (2001) in particular with regard to sub-paragraph 2(c) of the Resolution. Immediately after the adoption of the Resolution, all the relevant authorities in Republic of Macedonia were informed of the provisions and the obligations for the State arising from it. Since, the updated Security Council List of Suspect Terrorists and Terrorist Entities has been regularly circulated to the competent bodies and institutions to abide by them.  In June 2002, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia established an Inter-departmental Coordinative Body comprising of representatives of relevant Ministries (Foreign Affairs, Justice, Interior, Defence, Finance, Intelligence Agency) to coordinate the activities for fight against international terrorism, including those incorporated in Resolution 1373 (2001).  Concerning legislation, at its session held on 25.12.2001, the Government concluded that it is necessary to amend the extant legislation in this field, primarily Article 17 of the Constitution, in order to create legal basis for monitoring (surveillance) of communications. It was also concluded that amendments to the Criminal Law and the Law on Criminal Procedure, the Law the Prevention of Money Laundering, etc. were needed.  The latest Report of the Republic of Macedonia to the Counter-Terrorist Committee of the United Nations of 27.10.2003, contained detailed explanations of the completed and planned amendments to the legislation pertinent to combating terrorism: amendments to the Criminal Law of the Republic of Macedonia (adopted in 2004), to the Law on Criminal Procedure (adopted in 2004), to the new Law on Prevention of Money Laundering and Other Proceeds from Crime (adopted in 2004), to the new Law on Asylum and Temporary Protection (adopted in 2003) and the amendments of Article 17 of the Constitution (adopted in 2003). The amendments to the Criminal Law of the Republic of Macedonia (Official Gazette of the RM No. 19/04) reflect the efforts of the Republic of Macedonia to efficiently address the issue of the fight against terrorism at national level. These amendments refer to: stricter sanctions for terrorism as a criminal act, introduction of a new criminal act “terrorist organisation”, and changes in the description of the following criminal acts “uniting for the purpose of hostile activities”, “illicit use of chemical and biological weapons” and “money laundering and other illegal proceeds”.  The Law on Asylum and Temporary Protection (Official Gazette of the RM No. 49/03) implicitly stipulates that a foreigner does not have right of asylum if there is a founded suspicion of his/her involvement in terrorist activities. The amendments to the Law on Criminal Procedure (Official Gazette of the RM No. 74/04) are aimed to introduce special investigative measures to the criminal procedure, in accordance with the amended Article 17 of the Constitution (Official Gazette of the RM No. 84/03). Those amendments allow for the possibility of inspecting and disclosing the contents of private correspondence, when this is considered necessary for the prevention or detection of criminal acts, or when the security and defence interests are threatened or undertaking other special measures for the purpose of conducting investigation on the basis of a court decision or a decision of an investigative judge. For more details on all these Amendments in the legislation regulating this area see answer 24_H_03The Law on Prevention of Money Laundering and Other Proceeds from Crime (Official Gazette of the RM No. 46/04) is in compliance with the Council Directive 91/308/EEC of 10 June 1991 on Prevention of the Use of the Financial System for the Purpose of Money Laundering and the Second Directive amending the previous one, as well as with the international standards contained in the 40 Recommendations and the 8 Special Recommendations on Terrorist Financing of the Financial Action Task Force (FATF). Among other, the Law envisages that all subjects which, according to the Law, are obliged to undertake measures and activities to prevent money laundering have an obligation to prevent, and not later that 24 hours to report to the Financial Police on suspicious transactions involving clients for which national or international terrorism warrants are issued or are suspected to be connected with terrorist activities. The Directorate for the Prevention of Money Laundering, as a body within the Ministry of Finance, is in charge of collecting, analysing and processing data which the aforementioned subjects are obliged to submit according to the Law, and to undertake adequate activities in case of suspicious transactions. In June 2004, the Directorate became part of the Egmont Group for the purpose of strengthening the regional cooperation. The Directorate has hitherto concluded Memoranda of Understanding with the Financial Intelligence Units (FIUs) of Slovenia, Serbia and Montenegro, Bulgaria, Croatia, Albania, Romania and Ukraine.  For additional information see answer 24_H_07.  The Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia adopted the National Security and Defence Concept (Official Gazette of the RM No. 40/2003), aimed at improvement of security, protection of the basic values of the society and overcoming security risks and dangers, including terrorism.  In the area of counter- terrorism the Republic of Macedonia has concluded bilateral agreements with: Turkey (1992), Slovenia (1995); Croatia (1997); Bulgaria (2003); Montenegro (2003); Serbia (2003); Romania (2003) and Albania (2004). The cooperation with these and other countries of the region is carried out also in the framework of the regional initiatives. Concerning the cooperation with UNMIK and KFOR in Kosovo, the Ministry of the Interior in November 2002, signed with UNMIK a Provisional Protocol on Police Cooperation, which, inter alia, regulates the operational police cooperation, and coordination in dealing with acts of terrorism.  Concerning organised crime, which is closely linked to terrorism, the Republic of Macedonia on 28.09.2004 ratified the United Nations Convention on Transnational Organised Crime, as well as the UN Protocol to Prevent, Suppress and Punish Trafficking in Persons, Especially Women and Children. Furthermore, the implementation of the concept of Integrated Border Management through the adopted Strategy for Integrated Border Management (2003), establishment of the Border Police and transfer of competence from the Army to the Border Police contributes to strengthening the capacities to fight terrorist threats.   Furthermore, the Ministry of the Interior, through use of modern technical equipment for movement surveillance and preventing illegal crossing of the border, undertakes enhanced operational measures at the border crossings to prevent terrorist threats and movement of terrorists and terrorist groups in the border zones, as well as to prevent use of forged travel and identification documents. In addition, the Ministry of the Interior is improving the cooperation and exchange of intelligence and other information with the countries of the Region.  
11. In view of the Union’s policy to strengthen and develop its capabilities in international crisis management, it would be desirable to know if your country is ready to contribute personnel to EU civilian and military crisis management operations and if it has relevant operational training facilities for such civilian and military personnel. 
The Republic of Macedonia is ready to participate in EU civilian and military crisis management operations, within its capacities and available capabilities, depending on the nature and requirements of the EU missions. Though a small country of limited resources and capacities, the Republic of Macedonia is firmly convinced that even at this stage when it prepares for fully-fledged EU membership, it will be able to give appropriate contribution to the efforts to further strengthen EU’s role at the EU at the international stage.  The legal basis providing for participation of the Republic of Macedonia in international crisis management missions is envisaged in the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia, the Defence Law (Official Gazette of the RM Nos. 42/2001 and 5/2003) and the Law on Protection and Rescue Operations (Official Gazette of the RM No. 36/2004).  The application of resources that the Republic of Macedonia has available, for resolution of crisis situations is regulated by the Defence Law (Official Gazette of the RM Nos. 42/2001 and 5/03), specifically by Article 2, Paragraph 1, Subparagraph 4 and Article 14, which regulate the manner of fulfilment of the material resource related obligation.  Article 14, Paragraph 7 envisages that the material resource related obligation is elaborated in detail by a Government decree. Thus the Government adopted a Decree on the Type of Material Assets and Live-Stock that Citizens, Companies, Public Enterprises, Institutions and Departments are Obliged to Make Available for Use by the Ministry of Defence, the Armed Forces and the Civil Protection Forces in Wartime and in State of Emergency, as well as for Purposes of Exercises in Peacetime, defining also the  mode of keeping records and the amount of compensation for the resources’ use, damage or destruction (Official Gazette of the RM No. 84/2003).  Article 40 of the Defence Law, regulates the participation of the Army in the elimination of consequences in a state of emergency.  Article 41 of the Defence Law regulates the deployment of the Army outside the territory of the Republic of Macedonia.  Article 14 of the Defence Law regulates rights and duties regarding the financial compensation to citizens in exercising defence.  Article 5, Paragraph 1, Subparagraphs 11 and 12 of the Law on Protection and Rescue Operations (Official Gazette of the RM No. 36/2004) stipulate that protection and rescue units provide assistance in areas that have suffered large scale damages from natural disasters, epidemics, epizootics, epiphytotics, and other disasters and to other countries that have suffered large scale damages in such situations.   Article 16, Paragraph 1, Subparagraphs 4 and 5 of the same Law, stipulate that the Government of the Republic of Macedonia adopts decisions for sending humanitarian missions for protection and rescue assistance to other countries and decides on the deployment of protection and rescue units established by the Republic of Macedonia abroad for training, exercise and humanitarian activities in the context of the defence, under Article 17, Paragraph 1, Subparagraph 6 and 7 of the Defence Law (Official Gazette of the RM No. 42/2001). The Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia, inter alia, has competencies to: 1) adopt decisions on the accession and resigning from membership of collective security and defence systems; 2) ratify international agreements related to entry, transit or presence of foreign armed forces on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia to conduct exercise and training activities or participate in peacekeeping and humanitarian operations and decide on the deployment of Army units  similar activities and operations  abroad.  According to Article 19, Paragraph 1, Subparagraphs 5 and 6 of the Defence Law, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia has the competence to: 1. Adopt decisions on  deployment of armed forces of foreign countries on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia and on their transfer the purposes of conducting exercises and training activities or participation in peacekeeping and humanitarian operations in accordance with previously ratified international agreements; 2) adopt decisions on providing or accepting, respectively military-technical assistance to/from other countries.  The Law on Protection and Rescue Operations (Official Gazette of the RM No. 36/2004), in Article 16, Paragraph 1, Subparagraphs 4 and 5 (an obligation under Article 19, Paragraph 1, Subparagraph 7 of the Defence Law) envisages the following decision making competences of the Government in the context of protection and rescue operations: 1) sending humanitarian protection and rescue assistance to other countries, as well as accepting humanitarian assistance and protection and rescue teams from other countries; 2) sending protection and rescue units for training, exercise and humanitarian activities abroad  The Republic of Macedonia has undertaken a comprehensive reform of the security and defence system, in accordance with the National Security and Defence Concept and the Strategic Defence Review.  The absence of conventional threats against the Republic of Macedonia and the increase in unconventional and global asymmetric threats strengthened the country’s commitment to adapting and upgrading the civilian and military operative capacities and to their allying with partners in the Region and in the Alliance, in order to contribute to the international peace and stability.  In this respect, the Republic of Macedonia develops capacities for participation in international crisis management operations; furthermore it has already declared personnel for this purpose and remains determined to continually upgrade and advance such capacities.  In light of the consistence and compatibility of the European Security and Defence Policy with the European Security and Defence Identity, and in line with the EU crisis management requirements, the Republic of Macedonia is prepared to make available the existing capacities and those that it will develop for conducting conflict prevention missions, humanitarian and rescue operations, peacekeeping missions, for using combat forces in crisis management and peace making missions.  The Republic of Macedonia, as a country participating in the Southeast European Defence Ministerial (SEDM), is a Member-State of the Southeast European Brigade (SEEBRIG) established by the seven countries participating in the SEDM. The Brigade will become operational in 2005.  At the Conference held in Ljubljana (4-5.11.2004) the Defence Ministers of the SEDM Member-States decided on the potential deployment of SEEBRIG in peace-support operations led by the EU and NATO, including the upcoming mission in Bosnia and Herzegovina – Althea.  Under its membership in the Partnership for Peace and in the context of implementing the NATO Membership Action Plan, the Republic of Macedonia has declared the following forces for participation in operations, training and exercises:    One motorised infantry company;    One engineering unit (road construction platoon);    One communications and transportation detachment; and    One medical support section.  The units that are prepared for deployment are trained, equipped and capable of performing the necessary tasks and function in a Nuclear, Biological and Chemical (NBC) environment.  The units’ commands have the capacity of successfully commanding the available units. In accordance with the Strategic Defence Review, in the context of advancing and enhancing its forces and capacities, the Republic of Macedonia plans to make available the following forces:    Communications team;    Special operations company;    Mountain-alpine operations team;    Anti-terrorist operations team;    Military police platoon;    Engineering (sappers) platoon;    Human de-mining team; and    Staff officers.  The details of the declared and planned forces of the Republic of Macedonia to participate in operations, training and exercises are given in Annex 1 to this answer. The Republic of Macedonia will provide its own National Support Element for the declared forces.  The Republic of Macedonia expects that in the near future it will be able to achieve the allowed resource utilization level by deploying 210 troops, and secured rotation troops for various missions and composition of forces. In this context, the Republic of Macedonia has prepared a company for the peace operations SEEBRIG, engineering platoon and National Support Element (totalling 162 troops) for eventual participation in peace operation in 2005.  The Republic of Macedonia is committed to further increasing its participation in international peace missions.  The participation in the ISAF operations in Afghanistan and Iraqi Freedom remain on the agenda of the Republic of Macedonia.  The Republic of Macedonia has already increased the number of its troops from 10 to 19 in the ISAF-5 Mission that are part of the German contingent.  The rotation of troops goes as planned, twice a year, in February and August. Furthermore, preparations are underway for deployment of a medical team to Afghanistan, consisting of members of the Armies of the Republic of Macedonia, the Republic of Croatia and the Republic of Albania, as a result of the enhanced regional cooperation under the Adriatic Charter.  In respect of the Iraqi Freedom Mission, the Republic of Macedonia has deployed one Special Forces platoon, comprising of 32 staff of the Army of the Republic of Macedonia, 1 communications officer in the multinational formation in Baghdad and 2 officers in USCENTCOM in Tampa, Florida, or a total of 35 persons.  The rotation of troops goes as planned, twice a year, in June and December.  Furthermore, the Republic of Macedonia has provided logistical support to the KFOR Mission in Kosovo and in this connection it has made available:    The entire road and railway infrastructure;    The air space;    The Petrovec and Ohrid Airports;    The army training field Krivolak and the winter centre Popova Sapka;    Accommodation capacities;    Host nation support.  Based on the principle of the NATO Member-States, the establishment of a Host Nation Support Coordination Centre is in its initial phase in the Republic of Macedonia in order to gradually fully take over the provision of logistic support to NATO as a Host State.  Furthermore a Catalogue of logistic support capabilities is prepared. The Republic of Macedonia is prepared to make available the logistic capacities for the needs of crisis management operations led by the EU.  The Republic of Macedonia has civilian capacities and capabilities to participate in the EU civilian crisis management components at the Police, the Protection and Rescue Directorate, volunteer organisations and associations and enterprises the activities of which encompass protection and rescue (the Institute for Earthquake Engineering and Engineering Seismology - IEEES, the Veterinary Institute, the Civilian Construction Institute, etc.). A large number of institutions, such as the Fund for National and Regional Roads, the National Bank, the Macedonian Academy of Sciences and Arts – MASA, within their capacities, are ready to make part of their facilities available for operations of this type.  The Republic of Macedonia prepares and equips teams in accordance with international norms and standards, which if necessary could be included in missions outside the country for protection and rescue of population from different kinds of asymmetric threats.   Macedonia, through the EADRCC, offered assistance to the Republic of Greece for the 2004 Summer Olympic Games, which was accepted.  In a two-month period, the accepted capacities of the Republic of Macedonia were in state of readiness if necessary to be deployed in a matter of several hours.  The Republic of Macedonia participates in the OSCE Mission in Georgia with two border monitors.  The Republic of Macedonia actively participates in the Stability Pact for the South-eastern Europe Disaster Preparedness and Prevention Initiative.  With the support of the UNDP Office in Skopje, the Republic of Macedonia offered to be a Host State to the Secretariat of this Initiative.  The Republic of Macedonia’s project on Earthquake Monitoring in Support of Disaster Preparedness in SEE will be submitted for funding to the EC in the course of 2005. One of the priorities in the framework of this initiative is the completion of the network of bilateral and multilateral agreements in the Region to facilitate cross-border procedures for mutual humanitarian assistance and assistance in cases of disaster.  The Republic of Macedonia is a Signatory to the Agreement on the Establishment of a Civil-Military Emergency Planning (CMEP) Council for South East Europe (Official Gazette of the RM No. 70/2004). The capacities for participation in international conflict prevention and crisis management operations has certainly been enhanced based on the experience gained and the lessons learned in the course of the first and only successful UN Conflict Prevention Mission UNPREDEP (1993-1999), then in the period when the Republic of Macedonia hosted the NATO Extraction Forces for the members of the OSCE Verification Mission in Kosovo, in the Kosovo crisis, when the entire territory of the Republic of Macedonia served as logistical base for theoperations of the Alliance,  and after   the 2001 crisis, when the Republic of Macedonia hosted the NATO missions – Amber Fox, Essential Harvest and Allied Harmony.  An added value to the development of the country’s capacities and capabilities for participation in civilian and military crisis management operations are also the experiences gathered in the course of the deployment of the first Military EU Mission in the Republic of Macedonia – Concordia, and the EU Police Mission – Proxima. In connection with Proxima, special emphasis is placed on the project for regional and international cooperation aimed at encouraging, facilitating and supporting enhanced cooperation of special units in order to improve the capacity of the host country to contribute to fight against terrorism.  The cooperative effort mainly focuses on the special units and their counterpart units in the neighbouring countries, including the Greek unit –EKAM, the Albanian RENEA, the Serbian-Montenegrin SAJ and the Bulgarian FSOBT, with a view to contributing to the fight against terrorism and other forms of trans-national crime, and to the management of the specific situations in this field. The experiences acquired in the cooperation with the OSCE in the process of confidence building in the Macedonian former crisis areas, through the work of advisory groups on issues concerning citizens have contributed to developing police services to be involved in the civilian component of crisis management.  A wide range of training and seminars, under the Individual Partnership Programme of the Republic of Macedonia and NATO (IPP), then the bilateral cooperation with EU and NATO Member States, as well as the participation in international crisis management missions and international exercises have all facilitated the preparation of staff of the Republic of Macedonia for involvement in.  Participating in seminars, seminars and exercises, and exchanging experience, personnel directly involved in the crisis management system of the Republic of Macedonia acquire and transfer theoretical and practical experience about crisis management organisation and the functioning (participation in international simulation exercise CMX 05; preparation and participation in exercise under the Adriatic Charter, participation in seminars organized in cooperation with the Disaster Preparedness and Prevention Initiative (DPPI), participation in Civil Emergency Planning (CEP) and CIMIC seminars, etc.). The personnel are also trained on bilateral basis, with the assistance of Member States of the EU/NATO.  In 2004, two police officers were trained for peace operations with UN mandate at the Swedish Police Under the framework of Civil-Military Emergency Planning (CMEP), in May 2004, the Republic of Macedonia participated with 3 units (rescue, water cross over and first medical aid unit) in the international exercise in Karzali, Bulgaria. In the framework of the SEDM initiative for simulation training within the SEESIM crisis management, the Republic of Macedonia has been an active participant from the very outset of the initiative (participation in the exercise SEESIM 2002, SEESIM 2004), while for the next SEESIM 2006 exercise the defence ministries of the Republic of Macedonia and the Republic of Romania will have the role of co-organisers.  Nineteen representatives of the Republic of Macedonia –civil protection personnel participated in the exercise “Taming of the Dragon 2002” in the Republic of Croatia.  In 1997, the Republic of Macedonia was a host to the exercise “Rescuer ‘97”, with the participation of 9 countries.  The scenario of the exercise envisaged deployment of multinational military units for elimination of consequences of natural and technological disasters.  In 1997, the Republic of Macedonia also hosted the bilateral “Medical Exercise ‘97” with the participation of teams from the Republic of Macedonia and the United States.   The exercise “Cooperative Aura 2001” was held in 2001, in Ohrid with the participation of representatives from 10 countries and representatives of SHAPE and the PCC (Partnership for Peace Coordination Cell). The general aim of this exercise was to train participants for staff procedures at higher levels and to prepare them for involvement in NATO crisis management exercises.  Members of the special units for rapid deployment of the Ministry of Internal Affairs participated in crisis management exercises in Sweden and in the UK.  As a Member-State of the Partnership for Peace, the Republic of Macedonia has made available its training field Krivolak for a regional training centre according to the standards of NATO Member-States.  In 2003, a mixed group of the Army of the Republic of Macedonia and NATO assessed the suitability of the Krivolak training field for a regional training centre. According to the initial findings, only minor improvements are required so that the training field could be used to train infantry units up to the level of company, as well as to conduct training required for peace operations.  According to the Programme for Transformation of the Defence, the Republic of Macedonia, within its existing capacities, carries out restructuring and reorganisation of the system for military education and science, defence training and expert development, in accordance with the standards of NATO Member-States.  Special attention is paid to redefining the structure, role, tasks and the manner of education and training for the civilian defence system.  At the same time, due attention is paid to all new risks and threats relevant for the civilian defence, education, training and exercises, development of NCO personnel, personnel management, foreign languages learning, standardisation, codification, as well as for the defence education and training for all relevant state bodies, the companies and other institutions, and citizens.  The Strategy for Military Education and Science, Defence Training and Expert Development is drafted, which will be based on the complementary organizational set up of the Military Academy (MA), the Training Command (TC) and the Centre for Defence Training (CDT).  The competences of the MA are related to military education and expert development of officers for higher-level duties, while the competences of the TC are related to training of soldiers, NCOs and developing them for higher-level duties.  The competences of the CDT are related to defence training of civilian structures in accordance with the personnel management policy, to training in the area of crisis management, protection and rescue and civilian-military relations, to training and expert development of the other relevant subjects in the defence through programmes that will lead to better preparedness, expertise, professionalism and dedication to fulfilling the tasks. The Strategy will regulate the mode in which the three institutions will complementarily advance military education and science and defence training, and in this respect there will be training of civilian and military structures for crisis management.   Annex 1 Declared and planned forces of the Republic of Macedonia to participate in operations, training and exercises under the Partnership for Peace membership and the implementation of the NATO Membership Action Plan 
1. Declared forces 
Motorised Infantry Company  Branch:     Infantry Unit:    Company Type of unit:    Peace operations company SEEBRIG Readiness and sustainability:  the unit is 100% manned and equipped. 7 days independent sustainability  Availability:    01.01 2004 Limitations:    None Remark: If not deployed within SEEBRIG, it will be available for NATO/PfP Engineering platoon Branch:     land forces/engineering Unit:     Platoon Type of unit:    Engineering platoon Readiness and sustainability:  the unit is 100% manned and 90 % equipped. Partly English speaking with expert training for participation in peace operations. Independent sustainability for 7 days, afterwards relying on the National Support Element.  Availability:    01.01 2004 Limitations:    None Remark:  The engineering platoon is declared for SEEBRIG  Air communications and transport detachment Branch:     Aviation Unit:     Detachment Type of unit:    Transport, search and rescue  Readiness and sustainability:  Currently the unit is 100% manned, while the equipment needs to be modernised in accordance with the obligations assumed under the Partnership Goals and the NATO criteria. The unit will be logistically supported through its attachment to a lead nation for certain types of logistical support. From the logistic aspect it is fully independent for a 15-day deployment.   Availability:    01.01 2005 Limitations:    None Medical section Branch:  Medical service    Unit:    Section Type of unit:    Medical section  Readiness and sustainability:  The medical section will be fully independent from the aspect of logistics for a 15-day deployment.   Availability:    01.01 2005 Limitations:  None 
2. Planned forces 
Special Operations Company Branch:    Land Forces/special operations Unit:                                   Company Type of unit:                       Special Operations Company   Readiness and sustainability: The unit is currently 60% manned and 70% equipped Availability:    01.01 2006. Limitations:  The Company will be deployable to all geographical (global) areas and in all climate conditions, without limitations.  Remark:  The said equipment is given only for the first deployed unit.  The replacement units will have to be equipped with the same equipment and arms with the exception of equipment that is handed over (vehicles, thermal sights, and surveillance and communications equipment).  Military police platoon Branch: land force /military police  Unit:                                   Platoon Type of unit:                       Military police platoon   Readiness and sustainability: The unit is currently not manned or equipped. As such it has not been structured yet, but the Military Police has the capacity to compose the platoon within one month with 100% staff and about 50% equipment.  From the logistics aspect it is fully independent for 3 to 4 days deployment.  Availability:    01.01 2007. Limitations:  None.  Communications team Branch:    Land forces /communications Unit:                                   Team Type of unit:                       Communications  team  (Officers  –  2;  NCOs  –  2,  total  of  4 persons)   Readiness and sustainability: The unit is 100% manned and 90% equipped.  From the logistics aspect it will be self-sustainable for a period of 15 days. Availability:    01.01 2005. Limitations:  None.  Team for mountain-alpine operations  Branch: Land Forces /Special operations forces   Unit:                                   Team Type of unit:                       Team for mountain-alpine operations   Readiness and sustainability: The unit is 100% manned and 90% equipped.  From the logistics aspect it will be self-sustainable for a period of 15 days. Availability:    01.01 2005. Limitations:  None.  Remark:  The said equipment is given only for the first unit.  The units planned for replacement, will have to be equipped with the same equipment and arms with the exception of equipment that is handed over (vehicles, thermal sights, surveillance and communications equipment).  Team for anti-terrorist activities  Branch: Land forces /Special operations forces   Unit:                                   Team Type of unit:                       Team for anti-terrorist activities    Readiness and sustainability: The unit is 100% manned and 30% equipped.  From the logistics aspect it will be self-sustainable for a period of 7 days. Availability:    01.01 2006. Limitations:  None.  Engineering (road) platoon Branch: Land Forces /Engineering   Unit:                                   Platoon Type of unit:                       De-mining platoon (sapper platoon) composed of 2 teams.     Readiness and sustainability: The unit is 40% manned who have not yet given consent to participate in such missions, do not speak English and are not trained for participation in peace missions.  The unit is 60% equipped.  From the logistics aspect it will be self-sustainable for a period of 7 days, and afterwards it will rely on the National Support Element.   Availability:    01.09. 2006. Limitations:  None.  Humane de-mining team  Branch:    Land Forces/Army Unit:                                   Team  Type of unit:                       Humane de-mining team.     Readiness and sustainability: The unit is 100% manned and thus far it has not been invited to participate in missions of this type.  The personnel have international de-mining certificates and experience working only in the Republic of Macedonia.  It is about 70% equipped.  Concerning the logistics the team will depend on international factors.   Availability:    01.01 2006. Limitations:  None.  Remark:  The team have got international de-mining certificates but it needs additional training for mine explosives typical for the area of deployment. English language training (basic course) is also required.  Staff officers Branch:     Unit:                                   Type of unit:                       NATO commands staff officers.     Readiness and sustainability: There are 30 officers trained to work at the NATO commands.  Availability:    01.01 2005. Limitations:  None.  
12. In view of the Union’s current efforts to establish a European armaments policy, it would be desirable to have information on your country’s defence industrial base and to ascertain whether there are any obstacles to compliance with the above policy. 
The Republic of Macedonia supports the current efforts of the European Union to establish the European Armaments Policy and is ready to contribute, within the framework of its modest defence industry potential, to the strengthening of the European military capacities and capabilities. In this context, the Republic of Macedonia supports the establishment of the European Defence Agency for development of defence capabilities required for the EU crisis management, promotion of the European armament cooperation, strengthening of the European military industrial and technological basis and the establishment of a competitive European defence equipment market.  The production and trade of arms and military equipment for the needs of the Army and the Police of the Republic of Macedonia is regulated with the Law on Production and Transfer of Weapons and Military Equipment (Official Gazette of the RM No. 54/02. The Special Purpose Production Authority as a separate body within the Ministry of Economy is responsible for monitoring the operation of economic capacities for production and trade of goods and services for the need of the Army and the Police of the Republic of Macedonia. The Ministry of Defence does not have its own production capacities; thus for the products and services it needs, it concludes contracts with qualified companies. These companies are part of the domestic economic system and operate as independent economic entities. The modest defence industry of the Republic of Macedonia comprises three companies with specific military technology and production programmes:    Joint stock company “Suvenir”, with 97% state capital, produces ammunitions for small arms (7.62 mm rounds for “Kalashnikovs” 7.62 mm NATO ball, 9 mm PARA), hand grenades and provides overhaul of small arms and light weapons;    Joint stock company “Eurocomposite”, with 100% state capital, produces personnel ballistic protection gear (military helmets, ballistic vests and plates) and hand held anti-armour grenade launchers;    Joint stock company “MZT - Special Vehicles” with 52% state capital, overhauls artillery weapons and light combat vehicles (armoured personnel carriers).  For the needs of the Army and the Police, about 30% of the capacities of the first two companies are annually engaged, while in total, including their civilian programmes, only up to 50% of their capacities are used. These companies are not profitable, whereas their production is oriented towards the domestic market. Their capital is predominantly state owned. For the Joint stock company "Suvenir", a bankruptcy procedure has been initiated, while for the other two, privatisation procedures are underway, which are to be completed in the course of 2005. With the privatisation, an inflow of foreign capital is expected, which would be used for modernisation of the military technology and for alignment of the production programmes with the NATO standards.  The Republic of Macedonia is committed to abiding by the future European Arms Policy, and by the mechanisms and structures that will be agreed by the Member States. Within the NATO framework, the Republic of Macedonia has already participated in the work of relevant structures in this area (for example the Conference of the National Arms Directors - CNAD).   
13. In view of the provision for co-operation of diplomatic missions of Member States (Art. 20 TEU), it would be useful to have basic information on the structure, disposition, and numbers of your diplomatic service. 
The Ministry of Foreign Affairs comprises 12 Sectors – Cabinet of the Minister, Sector for General Affairs, Sector for Bilateral Relations with the countries of South-Eastern Europe and the Regional Initiatives, Sector for Bilateral Relations with European and Non-European Countries, European Union Sector, Sector for Collective Security and Defence Systems, Sector for Multilateral Relations, Sector for Foreign Economic Policy, Sector for Consular Affairs and International Law, Research and Analysis Sector, Sector for the Diaspora and Sector for Protocol.  The Republic of Macedonia has 42 diplomatic and consular missions abroad.  The Ministry of Foreign Affairs employs 330 people. Out of these, 192 work at the Ministry -144 diplomats and 48 administrative and technical personnel, while 138 employees work at the diplomatic and consular missions of the Republic of Macedonia abroad: 29 ambassadors, 3 consuls general, 85 diplomats and 21 administrative-technical employees.  The diplomatic network of the Republic of Macedonia comprises 42 diplomatic and consular missions: 29 Embassies, 7 Permanent Missions, 3 Consulates General and 3 Offices.   The diplomatic-consular network of the Republic of Macedonia spreads over five continents.   Twenty three of the embassies are in Europe - Austria, Albania, Bulgaria, Bosnia and Herzegovina, Belgium, United Kingdom, Germany, Italy, Poland, the Russian Federation, Romania, the Holy See, Slovenia, Serbia and Montenegro, Turkey, the Netherlands, Croatia, France, Hungary, Ukraine, Switzerland, Spain and Sweden.  Of the non-European countries, the Republic of Macedonia has embassies in the United States, Canada, Egypt, Australia and China. It, also, has non-resident ambassadors for other countries such as Japan, Israel, etc.  The Republic of Macedonia has seven permanent missions - at the United Nations in New York, the United Nations in Geneva, the European Communities in Brussels, NATO in Brussels, the Council of Europe in Strasbourg, to the International Organisations in Vienna and the FAO in Rome.  The heads of the diplomatic-consular offices in Europe, apart from the countries, where they are resident, are also accredited to other countries. Such is the case of the following member-states of the European Union: the Czech Republic, Estonia, Ireland, Latvia, Lithuania, Luxembourg, Portugal, Slovakia and Finland.  As for consulates general, there is one in Europe (Istanbul), one in Canada (Toronto) and one in the United States (Detroit).  The Republic of Macedonia has liaison offices in Athens, a Consular Section in Copenhagen and an Office for Consular, Economic and Trade Affairs in Thessalonica.  There are twelve honorary consuls, in the following countries: Switzerland, Italy, Lichtenstein, Norway, Finland, Pakistan, Japan, France, Spain, Austria, Island, and Germany.  